Castile, 1410–1469
John II (1406–1454)
John II’s long, tormented, and fairly incompetent rule was marked by
the growing power of princely factions and by the long and debilitating
struggle between these princely and noble pretenders and John II’s long-time
favorite, the enigmatic and cunning Don Alvaro de Luna. Until Ferdinand
of Antequera’s death in 1416, the king’s uncle and regent, remained a
custodian of the Castilian king, even though he was already the king of the
Crown of Aragon. He served as co-regent with Catalina of Lancaster, and
the affairs of both kingdoms marched in unison without too many com-
plications. The queen followed Ferdinand to the tomb two years later in
1418; only then did John II assume the throne. An indolent man, John II
was an easy prey to the influence or intimidation of others. And there was
never in Castile an absence of those who wished for far more than they
had – whether power, dignities, or possessions. Fabulous fortunes were built
at the expense of the Crown, and king-makers, or those who wished to see
themselves as king-makers – or, even worse, as kings – would be around88 Toward the Rule of the Catholic Monarchs, 1412 –1469
in such numbers and with such ambitions as to inflict severe damage on
the stability of Castile. 2
One of the most insidious problems was the close link between ruling
houses. When Ferdinand I of Aragon died, he was succeeded by his son
Alfonso V, the Magnanimous (1416 – 58). The new king spent most of his
life either trying to conquer Naples or, after succeeding in his plans, living
there and mostly concerned with Italian affairs. His two brothers, John (one
must admit that there are too many Juans or Johns in this story) and Henry
(too many Henries as well), collectively known as the Infantes of Aragon,
had been granted huge possessions and titles in Castile by their father while
he was regent of Castile. Henry, for example, was master of the Order of
Santiago, with control over its extensive holdings and military resources.
To complicate matters even further, John of Trastámara, the Infante of Aragon,
also became, though his marriage to Blanca, heiress of Navarre, king of the
Pyrenean kingdom in 1425. And then John II of Castile married María,
the sister of Alfonso V of Aragon and the Infantes. John II of Castile’s own
sister, yet another María, also married Alfonso V. Incestuous, as noted earlier,
is a good word to describe their close and dangerous intimacy.
I realize how very confusing this is all getting, but if I have descended
into these intertwining family histories it is to highlight how very much
of a family affair the politics of Castile became in this period, though, in
many respects, this was not very different from what happened in England
or France around this time. John II of Castile was the cousin of the king of
Aragon and the troublesome Infantes and twice over their brother-in-law.
All were, more or less, of the same age, but most certainly not of the same
ability or disposition, with poor John II of Castile overwhelmingly the less
gifted in every department. Thus, John II’s authority was immediately con-
tested, and Castile became a battlefield for the ambitions of these political
players. The Castilian king became more often than not a captive of one
of the factions vying for control of the kingdom or, when not under the
control of his enemies, in thrall to his favorite.
Luis Suárez Fernández’s account of the period in his Nobleza y monarquía
provides a rich guideline to the political complexities of the first half of the
fifteenth century. Shifting alliances, to the point of distraction, betrayals,
foreign conflicts followed each other so swiftly that a scorecard would be
needed to keep track of all the players, all the changing of sides, and all
the events. Nothing was simple. For example, the Infantes of Aragon could
and did work against each other, for individual ambitions trumped any
sense of family loyalty or political sense. By 1425, when the Infante of Aragon,
John, became king of Navarre, the Infante Henry had two brothers and a
cousin (and brother-in-law) who were kings. Surely, there must be a kingdomToward the Rule of the Catholic Monarchs, 1412 –1469 89
somewhere in the peninsula for him, and why not Castile? In 1420 the Infante
Henry imprisoned John II of Castile, two years removed from his long
minority, and for several months ruled Castile on behalf of his prisoner.
The king of Castile escaped in November of that year, partly because of
the Infante John’s mistrust of his brother and partly because of Alvaro de
Luna’s forceful intervention.
An illegitimate son of a minor noble but connected to the important
Luna family – his grand-uncle was Pedro de Luna, who as Pope Benedict
XIII was the main protagonist of the Great Schism – Alvaro was born in
1388 and sent to the royal court at the age of 20 to make his fortune. A
young man of great physical abilities (in spite of his slender frame), intel-
ligence, and charm, and with an iron will, Don Alvaro, as he is usually referred
to in the chronicles, became the inseparable companion of the much
younger John II. Their relationship became so intimate that the queen regent,
Catalina, had Don Alvaro removed from the court, only to bring him back
at the pleading and insistence of her son. When John took sole possession
of the throne, Don Alvaro’s mastery over the young king brought endless
complaints from the high nobility and intense resentment from the
Infantes of Aragon. 3
Most contemporary opinion, often hostile, depicted Alvaro de Luna as
a man of base origin and mostly concerned with building his own fortune.
Lacking a modern biography until Nicholas Round’s recent formidable study
of Don Alvaro’s life, we may see him as someone who did indeed make a
fortune at the expense of the royal domain, but who also fought mightily
for over four decades to restore and assert royal authority over a selfish
nobility and to focus Castile’s resources on the war against Granada. It was
Don Alvaro who freed the king in 1420.
Between 1418 and 1420, on the road to the first of John II’s many humili-
ations at the hands of his cousins the Infantes of Aragon, different factions
emerged at court and throughout the land. Some high nobles sided with
the Infantes of Aragon, or at least with one of them; others sided with the
king’s favorite. Most sought their own advantage and changed sides as needed.
The cast of characters on one side or another of the political spectrum
was always fluid and shifted according to political circumstances and the
ability of one faction to offer more than its enemies.
The great noble houses of Castile – Velasco, Enríquez, Manrique, Quiñones,
Pimentel, Mendoza, Stuñiga, Medinacelli, Villena, Fajardo, Guzmán, and
others – made fabulously rich by the Trastámaras’ gifts during the civil
war, now took sides in the conflict. The Enríquez, López Dávalos, Manrique,
and others supported the Infante Henry, while Gómez de Sandoval, Hurtado
de Mendoza, and even Alvaro de Luna supported the Infante John in an90 Toward the Rule of the Catholic Monarchs, 1412 –1469
earlier phase of the antagonisms between the two brothers. Yet the Infante
Henry was able to attract Alvaro de Luna’s support by granting him the
title of count and by sponsoring Alvaro’s marriage to the wealthy and well-
connected Elvira de Portocarrero. By the late 1410 and early 1420 the Infante
Henry seemed to be the undisputed winner. He had control of the king,
acting as a shadow king on John II’s behalf. He had outmaneuvered his
brother and accumulated titles and possessions that made him uniquely
powerful within Castile. But, as Suárez Fernández has argued, it was not
in the nature of the high-born Castilian nobility to allow any great noble
– and the Infante Henry, though of royal blood, was essentially just another
great magnate – to gain the upper hand. Their unrest allowed Alvaro de
Luna to rescue the king on December 10, 1420, though the rescue meant
essentially placing the king under the strict control of Don Alvaro.
The next few years witnessed continual conspiracies, shifting alliances,
and threats of war between Castile and Aragon as Alfonso V tried to check
Alvaro de Luna’s increasing power. As Don Alvaro’s enemies gathered
strength, signaled by a truce between the Infantes of Aragon at their
brother, Alfonso V’s, prompting, John II’s favorite went into yet another
exile. In many ways, one of Don Alvaro’s most remarkable assets was his
ability to retreat and accept defeat temporarily and thus to thwart his com-
plete destruction. Yet neither the king nor the kingdom could do without
Don Alvaro. The Infantes of Aragon were great at creating trouble, but not
too competent at ruling. Their identification with Aragon and Aragonese
interests did not make them overly popular in Castile either. By January
1428, Don Alvaro, by then constable of Castile, was back at the side of his
king. The return of the constable and the visit of Leonor, the daughter of
Alfonso V, on her way to Portugal to marry the heir to the Portuguese throne,
provided the setting for a whole month of festivities in Valladolid during
May 1428. This fantastic cycle of festivals (which I have examined in detail
elsewhere), undertaken in the squares of Valladolid in front of throngs
of citizens and visitors and costing fabulous sums of money, was partly
orchestrated by the constable for specific political purposes. In the rich
iconography and symbolism of the feasts, the clothing of the participants,
and the esoteric literary references, political points were scored and fought
over. We will have an opportunity to look at the significance of festivals
as cultural artifacts later on (see chapters 6 and 8), but the outcome of the
festival is what concerns me here. 4
After all the festivities and symbols had been played out, the Infante Henry
was ordered to remove himself to the frontier and to reassume his duties
as Master of the Order of Santiago in the struggle against Granada. His
brother, the Infante John (already king of Navarre since 1425) was equallyToward the Rule of the Catholic Monarchs, 1412 –1469 91
requested to leave the kingdom because, as the chronicle tells us, there
wasn’t room in Castile for two kings. 5 Alvaro de Luna’s significant victory
was followed immediately by royal (by which I mean Alvaro’s) attempts
to curtail noble power and to erode noble support for the Infantes of Aragon;
decisive victories, however, were elusive in Castile’s complex political land-
scape. Alfonso V, reluctant to give up his influence in Castile, summoned
his two brothers to his court and ordered them to put rivalries aside and
to mount a joint attack on Castile. Attempts at internal risings against
the constable’s government failed, as did the Aragonese invasion in 1429.
Don Alvaro, always prudent or calculating, did not press his advantage,
agreeing to a truce with the Aragonese.
The real victims of this continual strife were the royal fisc, the Castilian
economy, and the people. Devaluation of the coinage, heavy fiscal demands
on the Church (on the pretext of a crusade against Granada), and large
subsidies extorted from the Cortes did substantial damage, while Don Alvaro
bestowed lavish gifts and concessions on his supporters and on himself.
Nonetheless, by 1432 the Aragonese branch of the Trastámaras had been
forcefully removed from Castilian soil; Don Alvaro, securely ensconced in
his position as favorite and constable, began his personal rule. The king
gave himself completely to the hunt and chase, indolently leaving the
government of the realm in the hands of his favorite. As Suárez Fernández
has astutely pointed out, however, Alvaro de Luna’s rule was not a despotic
but an oligarchic one. Rather than rule on his own, he presided over and
guided a significant group of magnates, most of them connected by blood.
This high nobility, including the Velasco, Ponce de León, Stuñiga, Manrique,
and other families, received extravagant new titles and lands, the latter either
those confiscated from the Infantes of Aragon and their supporters or, worse
still, from continuous raids into the royal domain. In that sense, one must
qualify an earlier statement as to the role of Don Alvaro in strengthening
monarchical rule. While he did save Juan II from his predatory cousins and
heighten royal prestige at home and abroad, the price was high indeed.
Such a rule as that of Don Alvaro after 1432 implied continuous
struggles, conspiracies, and shifting alliances. It was good enough for the
constable to rally and lead the nobility into yet another attack on Granada.
It was another matter for the nobility to accept Don Alvaro’s leadership
without question or opposition. Thus the political situation was always
tense; and the romance and lavish displays of chivalrous feasts and military
actions could not always obscure the political violence lurking under the
surface. Be that as it may, the constable enjoyed substantial victories. He
had supported the winning papal candidate at the council of Basle in 1436,
guaranteeing papal support for his program. Aragon, with Alfonso V deeply92 Toward the Rule of the Catholic Monarchs, 1412 –1469
engaged in his Neapolitan venture, had been removed, at least tempor-
arily, from interfering in peninsular affairs. Portugal was mired in troubles,
and a settlement had been worked out with the Infantes of Aragon. The
most important aspect of the latter was the marriage of the king of Navarre
and Infante of Aragon John’s daughter, Blanca, to the Infante Henry, son
of John II of Castile.
From this position of relative strength, Don Alvaro sought to curb the
growing power of his noble allies. Instead, the constable faced widespread
noble rebellions throughout the realm, encouraged and supported by the
always troublesome Infantes of Aragon, above all with the king of Navarre’s
continuous political intrigues. The Navarrese king saw this as an oppor-
tunity to further his power and to dominate the political life of Castile. A
noble league against the constable was formed, and when the king of Navarre
joined its ranks formally, Don Alvaro de Luna, once again, withdrew from
the court and went into exile in 1439. The triumph of the noble league marked
the collective victory of the noble class and the defeat of the monarchy
and the Cortes. During all these civil commotions, the Cortes had played a
sorry role, either neglected or forced to acquiesce in the constable’s plans.
Now a triumphant nobility began to distribute land and titles to the chagrin
of the towns, which suffered fiscally and territorially from such excesses.
Within months rivalry and envy emerged among the high nobles, allow-
ing the constable to organize his own league with some urban and noble
support and, most of all, with the king’s unwavering loyalty. As these
factions fought for control of the king, Crown, and royal council, the con-
stable plotted his return. In many respects, though a great many of these
internecine struggles were about power, they were also about the govern-
ance, or the type of governance, of the realm. The great magnate families
wished for a weak monarch. An impotent king – and John II was as clumsy
a king as one could have – allowed the high nobility to accumulate wealth,
titles, and power at the expense of the Crown. Alvaro de Luna fought for
a strong monarch, because in the 1420s, 1430s, and 1440s royal authority was
in fact synonymous with his own authority. The high nobility, however,
lived in fear of weakening the Castilian king so much as to allow one of the
Infantes of Aragon, specifically the king of Navarre, to lord it over them and
to put a stop to their raiding of the royal domain. Urban elites did not profit
from civil strife and preferred a strong monarchy, although they were not
always of one mind as to who should be the king. In any case, in the first
half of the fifteenth century municipal councils were unable to reprise the
role they had played on behalf of the Crown a century and a half earlier.
In many respects, this question of how to organize and distribute power
was at the center of the long century and a half of civil conflict plaguingToward the Rule of the Catholic Monarchs, 1412 –1469 93
Castile. Although in the next chapter I will attempt to deal with these
matters in a more cogent fashion, one may preliminarily argue that in the
early fifteenth century the struggle was also about the extent of royal
power and the role of the high nobility in emerging national monarchies.
Medieval kings always ruled with the consent of their subjects, whether
noble or urban representatives. While this central principle of medieval
statecraft had been forcefully reasserted in the Realms of Aragon to the
detriment of the Crown, in Castile, as was the case in France and England,
the transition to new monarchical forms was still in play and would not
be resolved until the reign of Ferdinand and Isabella and their Habsburg
descendants. Even then, the resolution would only be partial.
This is why in Castile the great noble houses, mistrusting each other,
fearing each other, were willing to deal with Don Alvaro de Luna, their
worst enemy. In this free for all, the Infantes of Aragon were even willing
to make a deal with Don Alvaro (and, of course, as ready to betray him),
as they fought factions of the high nobility for control of the king and the
realm. By 1443, John II of Castile had become, once again, a virtual prisoner
of the Infantes of Aragon, as John, king of Navarre and now a widower,
married Juana Manrique (the future mother of Ferdinand the Catholic),
sealing his alliance with one of the most influential factions of the Castilian
high nobility. The confusing situation of the early 1440s imperiled monar-
chical power and the realm, prompting some nobles, bishops, and urban
representatives to push for a political compromise that would prevent Castile
from sinking into complete anarchy. Complicating matters, the Castilian
heir, yet another Infante Henry, already dominated by a favorite (at that
time Don Juan Pacheco, a high nobleman who would visit incredible dis-
order on Castile for the next few decades) also joined the oscillating game
of supporting and opposing his own father. 6
On May 19, 1445, those hoping for a noble oligarchy and those in favor
of a strong monarchy met on the battlefield at Olmedo, a battle which the
Coplas de Mingo Revulgo, as has been seen in chapter 2, glossed satirically.
At Olmedo, the royalist forces, with Don Alvaro leading them, soundly
defeated the noble host. The leaders of the revolt were captured. The Infante
Henry (one of the Infantes of Aragon) was severely wounded and later died.
The constable was once again firmly in control. And yet his victory was,
once again, short-lived. The heir to the throne, influenced by Pacheco, now
became the standard-bearer of noble privilege. A general pardon and a fresh
redistribution of grants to Don Alvaro’s noble supporters further weakened
the outcome of the battle of Olmedo. John II’s marriage to a Portuguese
princess (the future mother of Isabella the Catholic) brought new faces
and intrigues to the court that would prove the constable’s undoing in the94 Toward the Rule of the Catholic Monarchs, 1412 –1469
end. The great noble houses now rose to greater distinction and power,
benefiting from the new round of antagonisms. It is perhaps a reflection
of the great wealth Castile was able to generate in this period that such
gifts and concessions to the high nobility and Church could still be given
after almost a century of unrestricted raiding of the royal domain. Far more
remarkable was the ability of the realm to bounce back from such spoil-
ing of its resources.
Olmedo, for all its significance, solved nothing; from 1447 onwards,
the constable, now in open warfare with the heir to the throne, Henry’s
favorite Pacheco, and Queen Isabel, began slowly but inexorably to lose
his power. The next few years witnessed the ebb and flow of Don Alvaro’s
remaining influence at the court and on the king. Frontier wars with Granada,
Aragon, and Navarre did nothing to rally Castilians to the flag. By 1452
the game was over. Betrayed and abandoned by his king and queen, Don
Alvaro was captured and placed in prison by royal order. On June 22, 1453,
in a public ceremony in Valladolid, Don Alvaro de Luna was beheaded.
John II’s official chronicle describes his death in almost hagiographical terms.
Although the constable is taken through the streets of Valladolid while the
charges of tyranny are read to the throngs lining the streets and the square
where he was to be executed, the chronicler emphasizes the constable’s piety,
comparing him to a martyr. The crowd cries at the sight of the constable
on the stage in Valladolid’s main square. Don Alvaro dies the good Christian
death, but he also dies with extraordinary dignity and courage, an exem-
plary, chivalrous death. From the stage, Don Alvaro’s last words are for
John II, and he admonishes the king “to give better reward to those who
serve him [John II] than he has ordered for him [the constable].” Swiftly
and cleanly beheaded by the executioner, his head was displayed for nine
days and his body for three. In a silver bowl placed in front of his head,
the people of Valladolid deposited alms to pay for Don Alvaro’s burial. In
time his body and head were moved from one burial place to another until
ending at a sumptuous chapel in Toledo. The long hold that Don Alvaro
had exercised over his king, the realm, and the culture of Castile in the
first half of the fifteenth century had come to a tragic end. 7 Having lived
under Don Alvaro’s tutelage most of his life, the king could not live
without him, dying a year afterwards in July 1454, and leaving his poor
realm in far greater disorder than he had found it.
Henry (Enrique) IV of Castile (1454 –1474)
As troubled as John II’s reign had been, Henry IV’s rule was as chaotic
or even more so. Born on January 25, 1425, the Infante Henry witnessed,Toward the Rule of the Catholic Monarchs, 1412 –1469 95
and played a central role in, the political conflicts besetting Castile in the
1440s and early 1450s. Unlike his father, who remained fairly constant to
his favorite Alvaro de Luna until the last two years of his life, Henry moved
from one favorite to another. And although Alvaro de Luna was guilty of
many political sins, including building his own fortune at the expense
of the Crown, he did defend royal prerogatives and authority against the
ambitious Infantes of Aragon and the high nobility. Henry’s favorites, and
he had many throughout his life, could never be accused of lofty ideals or
any sense that they wished to advance the Crown’s interests. They cared
only about themselves.
An eccentric, much-maligned king, Henry IV may have been far more
capable than he has been portrayed by hostile chronicles. There have been,
in fact, several attempts to rehabilitate his historical standing. 8 An unfor-
tunate king with aesthetic sensibilities rare in his world – his royal seal, for
example, radically departed from the formulaic equestrian depiction
favored by previous Castilian kings 9 – his behavior was thought unacceptable
by most of the nobles vying for power. With great interest in the burgeoning
culture of his age, Henry often dressed and ate in Moorish fashion and had,
something unforgivable to his enemies, little taste for military conflict against
Granada. This is in spite of having conducted several successful expedi-
tions at the frontier early in his reign. His public life had begun on a very
inauspicious note. Married in 1440 to the Infanta Blanca, the daughter of
John II of Navarre (the Infante of Aragon – thus Blanca was a second cousin
to Henry), the heir to the Castilian throne, then a mere 15 years old, fled
the conjugal bed without consummating the marriage. The union had been
of course part of a political settlement and a door for John II of Navarre’s
hope for further interference in Castile. Henry’s response to his young bride,
together with his well-known and much-criticized homoerotic relations with
his young favorites, led to repeated charges of impotence – which would
prove crucial in later years. Early in life he fell under the influence of Juan
Pacheco, later marquis of Villena, a nobleman whom we have already met as
someone deeply connected to the disturbances and civil conflict of John II
of Castile’s reign. Pacheco, or Villena, as he would be known, played quite
a nasty role in Castilian politics until the reforms of Ferdinand and Isabella.
In the 1440s and 1450s he used the Infante for his own purposes, weak-
ening Alvaro de Luna and his king, and building an extensive domain in
the area of Murcia (the Marquesado of Villena) and a fabulous fortune.
In 1454 Henry, already king, began, under the tutelage of Villena, to make
plans for another royal wedding, probably to remove the bad taste left by
his failed marriage with Blanca. In 1455 he wedded Juana of Portugal, while
John II’s two other surviving younger children (Henry’s half-brother and96 Toward the Rule of the Catholic Monarchs, 1412 –1469
-sister), Alfonso and Isabella, remained putative rivals and claimants to
the throne in the absence of an heir. For all his shortcomings and early
difficulties, it seemed, in the early years of his reign, that Henry might still
restore royal authority. The difficulties were many. His early campaigns against
Granada, mostly raids aimed at weakening the Muslim stronghold, though
prudent in conception and strategically wise, drew the high nobility’s ire
since they favored big campaigns providing immediate and large profits.
Together with charges of impotence and sodomy, that of cowardice was now
also hurled at the king. The other thorny issue was how to distribute the
rich inheritance of Don Alvaro de Luna. On this issue Villena (Pacheco)
overplayed his hand and drew growing noble opposition. It did not help
that the king, though firmly in Villena’s hands in the late 1450s, still sur-
rounded himself with a retinue of young men of lowly origins, and that
he bestowed upon them great titles and fiscal benefits to the displeasure
of the high nobility. Such gifts were given in rapid succession to Don Miguel
Lucas de Iranzo, who rose to the rank of constable of Castile in spite of
his low origin, or to Beltrán de la Cueva, who amassed an immense fortune
based solely on the king’s favor.
The reality, of course, was that even a king of greater ability would have
run into noble opposition. Though titles and fortunes were at stake, a greater
issue was the constitutional (if such a word can be used in this context)
structure of the realm. In many respects, the nobles had organized a league
to thwart the emergence of a strong monarchy. That league, a kind of
medieval Castilian Fronde (after the league against Mazarin and the young
Louis XIV in seventeenth-century France), had its origins in the reign of
John II, and now was reinvigorated by Henry IV’s policies and behavior,
and Villena’s excessive ambitions. As always, Alfonso V of Aragon, based
in Naples, and his brother, the surviving Infante of Aragon, John, king
of Navarre, played their destructive roles in the mounting conflict. To counter
this, in the late 1450s Villena sought alliances with the Aragonese faction,
withdrawing Castilian support for the pretensions of Carlos, prince of Viana,
who had challenged the rule of his father and uncle (see below), provid-
ing yet another example of how far the political life of both realms had
become intertwined. Actions in one kingdom always had immediate reper-
cussions in the other.
While all these confusing and shifting alliances were taking place, three
significant developments occurred. One was the splitting of the noble olig-
archy once more into opposing bands. On one side we find the marquis
of Villena, already in firm control of the Military Order of Santiago (and
its vast resources) and enjoying significant ecclesiastical and noble support,
while on the other side the most powerful of all Castilian noble families,Toward the Rule of the Catholic Monarchs, 1412 –1469 97
the Mendozas, worked out an agreement with the late Alvaro de Luna’s
remaining supporters and descendants on behalf of a strong monarchy.
This development was of course soon negated by further betrayals and
reversals, but it planted the seed for a segment of the nobility to support
Isabella’s cause later on.
A second significant development was the birth of an heir, the Infanta
Doña Juana, in 1462, seven years after the marriage between Henry IV and
Juana of Portugal. Since in Castile women could inherit the throne, the
Infanta was sworn by the Cortes as the legitimate successor to Henry. The
birth and legal recognition of his daughter as heir came at a time when
Henry had gained important victories on Navarre’s frontier and when the
Catalans, by then in open revolt, offered him the rule over Catalonia on
August 11, 1462 (see below). But all these promises for a restoration of royal
authority came to nothing, as the marquis of Villena, once again, betrayed
the king and made his own independent settlements elsewhere. The king’s
political, as opposed to his alleged sexual, impotence was quite evident to
everyone by 1463; from there the road into anarchy descended quickly along
a sharp slope.
Third, as the king fell under the nefarious influence of Beltrán de la Cueva,
Villena and his allies began to raise questions as to Juana’s legitimacy. By
1464 charges that the Infanta Juana was in reality the daughter of Beltrán
de la Cueva began to surface in an attempt to transform the Castilian polit-
ical landscape. Within this context of ever-shifting alliances, slanders, and
intrigues, one may summarize some of the salient events. By 1464 noble
factions fought each other, changed sides, and betrayed one another as often
as possible. Led by Villena, the great aristocratic clans of the Mendozas,
Enriques, de Haros, and other powerful lineages sought to institutionalize
a noble oligarchy as the main political order within the realm. They could
not do so, however, without a king; thus, part of their policy was the aim
to control the king or, after the Infanta Juana’s legitimacy was called into
question, to control either of John II’s two remaining children, Alfonso
and Isabella, or both. This led to the preposterous and abhorrent proposal
to marry Isabella to the much older and corrupt Girón, a member of
the Villena clan, and to actually abduct the Infante Alfonso and proclaim
him king.
Meanwhile the ever weaker Henry IV came to lean further on Beltrán
de la Cueva, now Master of the Order of Santiago – whom the king
misguidedly saw as another Alvaro de Luna – and on a bevy of “new men”
(a good number of them conversos) and university-trained bureaucrats.
Remarkably, the monarchy still had an extraordinary reservoir of goodwill
among the peasantry and the lower orders of society. In that fateful year98 Toward the Rule of the Catholic Monarchs, 1412 –1469
of 1464, as Villena and his forces prepared to assail the king, thousands of
peasants armed with pitchforks, knives, and staves rallied around the king
and escorted him to the safety of his beloved Segovia. This deep-rooted
and popular understanding of the king as the final preserver of order and
justice came to full fruition during Isabella’s first years as queen.
Popular support for the monarchy, however, was not yet fully articulated.
The king was, after all, not capable of leading a popular movement per-
manently. A gathering of nobles and ecclesiastics in Burgos in 1464 drew
up a list of charges against the king and his favorite. The charges – that
the king was too friendly to the Muslims, that he minted bad coins and
distorted justice, that he had relinquished his powers to his favorite
Beltrán, plotted to kill his half-brother and half-sister, and, most damning
of all, that the heir to the throne, Doña Juana, was illegitimate – resonated
deeply throughout the realm. The king, as always, sought to compromise.
He sacrificed Beltrán de la Cueva, who was forced to resign as Master of
the Order of Santiago, while also surrendering the Infante Alfonso to the
nobility. This, however, did not prove to be enough. In 1465, at Medina
del Campo, a commission dominated by the rebellious nobility ordered the
exile of the king’s supporters and the recognition of the Infante Alfonso
as the legitimate heir to the throne. The king finally reacted. As the two
contending factions prepared for a resolution in the field of battle, the
monarchy sank to its nadir. On June 5, 1465, outside the walls of Avila, in
a theatrical performance already brilliantly interpreted by Angus MacKay
more than a decade ago, an effigy of Henry had its crown, sword, and scepter
ritually removed, and then was rudely kicked off the stage as the Infante
Alfonso was proclaimed king. 10
The “farce” of Avila, as this event came to be known, represented the
lowest point in the history of the Castilian monarchy, but it also marked
a turning-point in the history of Castile. Not all the great noble lineages
recognized Alfonso as king. Vast regions of the realm and many of the
kingdom’s popular elements remained faithful to Henry, showing at this
impasse the enduring power and prestige of the monarchy. Others rallied
to the king as well. Led by Segovia, the Castilian towns, which had proven
to be particularly passive through the long decades of unrest, organized
themselves officially into a general Hermandad (see chapter 6), providing,
as they did for Isabella in the early 1470s, new strength to the royal cause.
After Henry IV’s symbolic dethronement and ritual humiliation outside
the walls of Avila, the next decade witnessed a slow dance between the
different political actors, as they sought to clarify the succession issue and
define who was going to rule Castile. In many respects, these were the same
issues that were disputed during Isabella’s early years and not settled untilToward the Rule of the Catholic Monarchs, 1412 –1469 99
the Catholic Monarchs’ decisive victory over their noble rivals and other
claimants to the throne in the late 1470s.
With three possible candidates to succeed Henry IV, each faction embraced
one or other of the candidates at least once. The king’s daughter – whether
legitimate or not – had been recognized by the king and the Cortes as the
rightful heir, though this decision was later revoked. The Infante Don Alfonso,
the king’s half-brother, had already been raised as king by the rebellious
nobles in Avila, and Henry had been forced to acknowledge him as his
heir. Finally the Infanta Doña Isabella became the object of innumerable
marriage plans by which different noble clans sought to advance their own
political agendas. The young princess was even for a while in the hands
of Villena. Obviously the magnates supporting or advancing a particular
candidate seldom thought of advancing the monarchical cause or restor-
ing order. Rather, their aim was to firmly control these putative royal heirs
and to advance further their own individual or family designs. In the mean-
time, the royal domain and rents continued to be dismembered by the nobles’
insatiable appetite. General disorder prevailed.
On July 5, 1468, the Infante Don Alfonso, or King Alfonso XII to some
of his supporters, died of a sudden illness. That left Isabella as the most
logical heir, leading to hurried realignment of the kingdom’s political forces.
Suárez Fernández, whose careful reconstruction of this turbulent period
has been one of the main guides for this brief summary of events, has argued
perceptively that the problem at hand was not necessarily that of the royal
succession, that is, who had the legitimate right to succeed Henry IV; rather,
the issue was whether the authority of the nobility or that of the Crown
would finally prevail in Castile. 11 I will argue in the next chapter that the
eventual triumph of monarchical ideals was foreshadowed in the institu-
tional reforms and transformations of the previous two centuries, but one
glance at France shows that the final triumph of kings could be delayed
for quite a while, and that the nobility not only proved resilient but capable
of bouncing back even after strong kings. That, however, was not the case
in Castile.
As these issues were debated, Henry IV’s queen, Doña Juana, who had
been given as a hostage to one of the noble families, became pregnant by
another man. The queen’s notorious sexual misconduct further weakened
the Infanta Juana’s claims, and Isabella moved boldly to delegitimize
her niece and to gain recognition for her own claims. After a long series
of negotiations between the king and Isabella’s supporters, an agreement,
known as the Pact of the Toros de Guisando (from the place where it was
signed), was reached on September 18, 1468. The king declared his recogni-
tion of the Infanta Juana as his heir null and void and named Isabella as100 Toward the Rule of the Catholic Monarchs, 1412 –1469
his rightful successor. In return Isabella and different noble factions renewed
their allegiance to the king. Henry IV’s disastrous concessions acknowledged
the Infanta Juana’s illegitimacy which, after years of scurrilous attacks
on her legitimacy and on the queen’s sexual behavior (or misbehavior), was
not difficult to believe. The question that remained was: who was going
to control Isabella? On the assumption that Princess Isabella (as she titled
herself after the settlement) could be managed, those plotting to that end
were wrong.
One of the conditions of the Pact of the Toros of Guisando was that Isabella
was to be married soon. The choice of her husband and future king of
Castile was indeed a weighty political decision. Portuguese, French, and
Aragonese candidates emerged immediately; each of them with his own
promise of significant diplomatic and political gains, but also with great
disadvantages. Isabella, acting with growing independence, rejected the
Portuguese alliance and later on the French one as well, strongly inclining
to a union with Ferdinand, the heir to the Crown of Aragon. An Aragonese
marriage brought fears to many of Castile’s magnates, as the memory of
the role played by the Infantes of Aragon remained very much alive in Castile.
After all, Ferdinand was John I, king of the Crown of Aragon’s son (the
former king of Navarre and, in an earlier incarnation, king-maker in Castile).
John’s nefarious interference in Castilian affairs for over four decades had
left a rather sour impression among Castilians. After protracted negoti-
ations between Isabella and Ferdinand defining the extent of each other’s
power in their respective realms – negotiations which belie the romanti-
cized version of their wedding – and a cold assessment of what Aragon could
contribute to Isabella’s cause in Castile, the princess fled the grip of her
noble captors to the safety of Valladolid. Ferdinand traveled to Castile, and
on October 18, 1469, under the protection of a forged papal bull allowing
the marriage, the fate of the two great Iberian kingdoms was sealed, and
everything in Spain was changed.
Since the marriage had been undertaken without the king’s approval (one
may read here without Villena’s approval), attempts were made to reverse
the agreement of the Toros de Guisando. Denying the validity of his pre-
vious oaths, the king, joined now by his unfaithful wife, declared Isabella’s
succession rights void and recognized the poor Infanta Juana (a veritable
football in the political struggles) as the legitimate heir. Anarchy prevailed
as the great noble lineages sought to carve out independent regions under
their control. The civil war that followed, or rather a war that pitted dif-
ferent noble factions against each other, is described in detail in John Edwards’
volume in this series and summarized in chapter 9 below. 12 As we come
to the end of this political narrative for Castile, one must acknowledgeToward the Rule of the Catholic Monarchs, 1412 –1469 101
that while the marriage of Ferdinand and Isabella is rightly considered
a watershed in the political history of the peninsula, for contemporaries
the union in 1469 represented yet another chapter, and not a promising
one, of Spain’s troubled late medieval history. It would take another decade
to restore some semblance of order in Castile, and this could not have been
possible without Ferdinand’s cunning political skills and Aragonese con-
tributions. The son of one of the most notorious troublemakers helped lay
the foundations of an ordered and well-policed society as Spain, and above
all Castile, was propelled into the modern world.
The Trastámaras in Aragon, 1412–1479
The history of the Crown of Aragon in this period was a very different one
from that of Castile. Ferdinand of Antequera’s ascent to the thrones of the
diverse realms of the Crown of Aragon in 1412 was never an easy process.
His capture of Antequera in 1410, a signal victory in the long history of
peninsular Reconquest, and his steady hand as co-regent for his young
nephew John II had propelled him to a prominent place in Iberian affairs.
When Martin the Humane died without heirs in May 1410, Ferdinand
became one of several candidates to the throne of the Realms of Aragon.
The closest familial claim was that of Frederick (Federico), the bastard
son of Martin the Younger, that is, the grandson of Martin the Humane,
but Federico’s illegitimacy, long connection to Sicily, and general lack of
support in the peninsula made him an untenable candidate. Other main
contenders emerged along with a bevy of foreign and local pretenders to
the Crown. The first of the two main candidates was Jaume d’Urgell, a descend-
ant of Alfonso IV. The second, and successful, candidate was Ferdinand
of Antequera, who also had strong family connections to the last Aragonese
king. Ferdinand’s mother, Eleanor, was Martin the Humane’s sister.
The period between 1410 and 1412 witnessed fierce factional warfare
in Aragon and Valencia between the partisans of both candidates, while
the Generalitat, in unusual behavior for the always rebellious Catalans,
kept order within the Principality and pushed for a political compro-
mise. Ferdinand’s influential role in Castilian affairs raised fears among
the independent-minded Aragonese and Catalans, but his ability to deploy
Castilian resources – the object of Aragonese fears – also allowed him to
muster troops (diverted from following up on his victory at Antequera with
an attack on Granada) to strengthen his hand within Aragon and Valencia.
At Caspe in June 1412, commissioners selected by the three different polit-
ical entities comprising the Crown of Aragon (including the powerful102 Toward the Rule of the Catholic Monarchs, 1412 –1469
and charismatic preacher, and later saint, Vincent Ferrer) gave the nod to
Ferdinand as the new ruler of the Aragonese Realms. As we already know
from the discussion of Castilian history in the early half of the fifteenth
century, the Aragonese, Catalans, and Valencians had little to fear in reality.
If anything, it was the Infantes of Aragon who interfered in Castilian polit-
ics and not the other way around. Yet one can also read the history of
the peninsula in this period as the hegemony of Castile’s royal family, the
Trastámaras, over all of the Spanish realms. Moreover, the Trastámaras’ obses-
sive attention to Castile’s internal politics had a detrimental effect on
the neglected realms of Aragon. The rule of one family over most of the
Iberian realms increased rather than diminished the conflicts between the
different kingdoms.
Ferdinand I (1412–1416)
The new king moved swiftly to consolidate his rule and to insure a smooth
succession. His son Alfonso was sworn as heir to the throne shortly after
Ferdinand’s coronation, while his second son John (the Infante of Aragon
and eventual king of Navarre and of the Crown of Aragon) became lieuten-
ant general in Sicily, in an attempt to prevent Sicily and Sardinia from
breaking away from Aragonese–Catalan rule. Shortly before his untimely
death on April 2, 1416, Ferdinand I took decisive steps to end the Great
Schism by withdrawing his support for Benedict XIII, the Luna pope. This
represented a courageous or treacherous step (depending on which side
of the issue one was), considering that the pope had strongly supported
Ferdinand’s candidacy to the throne and his policies in Sicily. Ferdinand’s
death, after only four years as king, opened the way for Alfonso V the
Magnanimous’s long and complex rule. Alfonso, besides ruling over the Crown
of Aragon and its Mediterranean possessions for many years, qualifies
as one of the great Renaissance princes. Choosing to live in Naples, he
was keenly interested in Italian affairs and culture and an important
art patron. 13
Alfonso V (1416–1458)
Born in 1396, the eldest son of Ferdinand of Antequera and Leonor de
Albuquerque, the richest heiress in Castilian history and the quintessential
rica hembra – it was said of her that she could ride from Castile’s frontier
with Aragon to that with Portugal without ever stepping out of her lands
– Alfonso benefited from a substantial inheritance in Castile, as did his
troublesome brothers. This gave him a very high stake in Castilian affairs,Toward the Rule of the Catholic Monarchs, 1412 –1469 103
as he had in the Mediterranean through his Aragonese inheritance. Married
to Maria of Castile, John II’s sister, as one of his own sisters was married
to the king of Castile and another to the Portuguese heir to the throne,
Alfonso’s life was deeply woven into the fabric of peninsular dynastic
politics, and these familial ties and properties in Castile drew the Aragonese
king inexorably into Spanish affairs, even though his heart and body were
firmly settled in Naples. Because of his interest in Italy, Alfonso V was
throughout most of his long reign an absentee ruler, though his wife rep-
resented him most effectively in Catalonia during more than two decades
of his rule, while his brother John served as his proxy in Castile. Yet, regard-
less of Maria of Castile’s considerable abilities and the conflicts between
the Infantes of Aragon and Alvaro de Luna which effectively prevented Castile
from interfering in the eastern kingdoms’ politics, ruling the Crown of Aragon
was no easy task. Nor was managing rivalries with Genoa in the western
Mediterranean or handling the pope or Italian politics any easier.
In the Crown of Aragon proper, Alfonso V met the immediate resistance
of Catalonia’s civic leaders, always jealous of their liberties and privileges.
The discontent was replicated in Aragon and Valencia, which voiced, on
very specific grounds and for very good reasons, their mistrust of Alfonso’s
Castilian advisers. The Corts of the Realms of Aragon also expressed the
desire to have the king respect traditional liberties, showing great reluctance
to finance his ventures in Italy, and making repeated requests for his return
home. Complicating matters further, the political machinations and erratic
behavior in Castile of the Infantes of Aragon prompted Aragonese armed
interventions (1425) which, to add insult to injury, did not prove very
successful. The king responded promptly. In Aragon and Valencia, either
through fiscal and political concessions or through an occasional show
of force, Alfonso V was able to secure some steady support for his Italian
campaigns. This he did mostly by bowing to the long-established Aragonese
and Valencian tradition of foral (from fueros or charters) rights and “con-
stitutional liberties,” though from time to time, as was the case in Aragon
in 1442, the king met stiff resistance. In that instance, Alfonso V agreed to
enhance the powers of the Justicia of Aragon (a sort of ombudsman who
kept a careful watch on Aragonese liberties), together with other reforms
which, while limiting royal authority, provided the king with a free hand
in Italy.
Catalonia, as always, was another matter. Caught in the factional struggles
between the high nobility and urban representatives, the king faced stiff
resistance from both camps, insistent on diminishing royal power and
creating rival centers of power. Though Alfonso navigated these troubled
waters rather diplomatically, making strategic concessions when needed to104 Toward the Rule of the Catholic Monarchs, 1412 –1469
avoid open confrontation, the demands of each of the branches represented
at the Corts amounted, in Bisson’s words, to “a veritable constitutional pro-
gramme.” 14 At the Corts of St. Cugat and Tortosa (1419 –20), the Catalans
asked for the power to veto royal appointments to the king’s council,
judicial independence, and the precedence of the Usatges (the old foral codes
of Barcelona and Catalonia) over new royal legislation. In return the king
was to receive a substantial subsidy. Again, citing Bisson, the Catalonian
pactists (from pact or constitutional agreement with the Crown) sought a
share of power unprecedented in the medieval West. 15
Even if the negotiations came to nothing, and both sides were left with
accumulated ill will toward their opponents, the negotiations between
the Corts and the king set the boundaries for the political aspirations of
different political forces within the realm and highlighted the serious dif-
ficulties present in ruling the Crown of Aragon in general and Catalonia
in particular. Alfonso V, however, was willing to concede a lot as long as
he could focus on Mediterranean affairs. But this was a long-term project
at best. His policies in the Mediterranean and Italy would take more than
two decades to bear fruit, at great human and fiscal cost. Alfonso’s strat-
egy can be summarized as follows: first and foremost, the Aragonese king
continued the long struggle against Genoa for control of Corsica and trade
in the western Mediterranean. Genoa’s power had been ebbing as other Italian
principalities or republics rose to prominence in the Italian peninsula. Genoa
had, in fact, come under the suzerainty of the Visconti (the rulers of Milan).
Although Genoese merchants and seafarers still played a significant role
in the commercial exchanges of the western Mediterranean and in the expand-
ing Atlantic trade, the city’s glory days as a pre-eminent naval power
were already on the wane. Corsica was central to Genoa’s influence in the
Mediterranean; it soon became a battleground. Alfonso V’s invasion of
the island in 1420 led to a series of Aragonese victories and reverses, and the
uncertain outcome of these campaigns kept both powers engaged in a long
and debilitating struggle. Snatching victory out of defeat, Alfonso V, after
being badly beaten at the naval battle off Ponza (August 1435) and carried
away to Milan as a prisoner, was able to charm the Milanese into a treaty,
opening the door to a final and conclusive Aragonese victory in 1442. 16
Alfonso’s policies and eventual success in his struggle against Genoa
and eventual control of Corsica were deeply bound up with Catalonia’s
long-term strategy in the western Mediterranean and in line with Alfonso
V’s wishes to either secure or maintain Catalan control over Sardinia and
Sicily, and the even greater price of ruling over the kingdom of Naples.
Recognized as heir to the Neapolitan throne by Queen Giovanna in 1421
(and then disowned as the queen chose René of Anjou instead), AlfonsoToward the Rule of the Catholic Monarchs, 1412 –1469 105
committed all his energies to establishing his rule over what would become
his beloved Naples. Alfonso V’s policies drew him further away from the
internal affairs of the Crown of Aragon and Spain, that is, from having
to deal with economic decline in Catalonia, endless bickering over “con-
stitutional liberties,” and endemic troubles with Castile. The possibility
of starting anew as an Italian Renaissance prince appealed strongly to Alfonso
V’s political ambitions and aesthetic sensibilities.
To do that, however, required great effort. First, Sicily had to be secured
by Aragonese–Catalan contingents in 1435 after fresh agreements with Milan.
Alfonso V landed in the island and remained there for two years while
seeking to assert royal control over Sicily’s restless inhabitants. But Naples
beckoned. Once again, as had been the case after the Sicilian Vespers in
1282, the French and Aragonese were matched against each other for
control of southern Italy. Besieging Naples in 1438, Alfonso V led a four-
year campaign against the city until in 1442 the Aragonese–Catalan army
breached Naples’ defenses and captured the city. Invested as king by Pope
Eugenius IV in 1443, while his bastard son Ferrante was recognized as heir
to Naples, an event marked by lavish celebrations (see chapter 8), Alfonso
V was now a true Renaissance prince. As such, he was drawn into the
endless tug of war of Italian politics. Turning his back on his Visconti ally,
Alfonso overextended his reach in his ambition to control Milan, while his
long-suffering peninsular subjects yearned for his return.
One could look at Alfonso V’s balance sheet and attempt to assess the
impact of his Italian ventures on Spain. In hindsight, Aragonese–Catalan
rule in southern Italy and in the great Mediterranean islands of Sicily
and Sardinia projected Spanish power into Italian affairs. Ferdinand the
Catholic’s policies in 1494 and Spanish intervention in Italy in the late
fifteenth and early sixteenth centuries had their foundation in Alfonso V’s
struggles for Naples. The new Neapolitan king was astute enough to foster
Catalan (and Valencian) commercial outposts throughout the Mediterranean,
establishing secure and profitable foundations for Catalan and Valencian
trade. Rule over Naples provided a direct link between Renaissance Italy
and the Iberian peninsula; the reception of humanist learning in both
the Crown of Aragon and Castile – in the latter kingdom through the
Trastámara connection – had important consequences for Spanish culture
and politics in the late fifteenth century.
Yet, Alfonso V’s single-minded preoccupation with Italian affairs had a
deleterious impact on the different realms of the Crown of Aragon. As gifted
as Queen María or the Infante John, despite his stubborn interference in
Castilian affairs, were as representatives of their husband and brother
respectively, they could not fully compensate for the long absence of106 Toward the Rule of the Catholic Monarchs, 1412 –1469
the king. Barcelona’s, and with it Catalonia’s, economic decline continued
apace. In return, the region’s progressive impoverishment had dire social
and political consequences. Aragon did not fare much better as the frequent
royal requests for subsidies to pay for the Italian campaigns and the gov-
ernance of Naples badly drained much needed resources. In Catalonia
a veritable class struggle devastated the Principality. Magnates against
knights, urban elites against those below them, landlords against their servile
peasant population, and in Barcelona the old and endless rivalry between
the Biga and the Busca, all of these conflicts flared up to new and higher
levels of intensity. By the mid-fifteenth century, peasant (remenças) agita-
tion against harsh conditions and the absence of freedom under which they
toiled became the central issue of the period.
The Remenças
If I may be allowed to digress, we should here briefly examine the rebellion
of the remenças. The long-lasting rebellion of Catalan peasants, seeking to
gain the right to purchase their freedom, drew elements of the high nobility
and urban commercial interests into the conflict. Everyone, at the end,
had a stake in the rebellion, and most of all the Crown. As such the war
of the remenças was not typical of fourteenth- and fifteenth-century popular
risings elsewhere in Europe, which pitted those on top against those below,
and certainly not typical of Castile. The Catalonia remença rising was indeed
part of a complex political process, and the outcome was a political one
as well. Its roots lay in the period just described. The remença peasants’
status and the harsh conditions under which they labored were completely
out of step with developments elsewhere in the medieval West and in the
rest of Iberia. The remenças were serfs and, as such, bound to the soil. As
has been noted earlier, they toiled under harsh social and fiscal burdens,
their wives and daughters open to assaults from the nobility, a source of
grievance compounded by the use of peasant women as wet-nurses for
the nobles’ children. As will be seen below, at the Sentencia of Guadalupe
in 1486, shortly after the chronological terminus of this book, the recently
crowned Ferdinand the Catholic granted peasants the right to purchase
their freedom.
Alfonso V played both sides of the political spectrum in confronting the
remença revolt. And when the king entertained freedom for the peasants
as a possibility – as long as a substantial amount of money was added to
the royal coffers – he opened the door to the remenças’ long and success-
ful struggle to gain their freedom. In doing so, he also opened the door to
endless years of civil war.Toward the Rule of the Catholic Monarchs, 1412 –1469 107
In the end Alfonso V, by giving prominence to Naples over his penin-
sular realms, diminished the significance of the latter. By bequeathing Naples
to his bastard son Ferrante, Alfonso also failed to create a true Mediterranean
empire. The timing was also inauspicious. By casting his lot with the
Mediterranean, Alfonso V joined the fray at a time when the Ottoman
Turks, fresh from their historical conquest of Constantinople in 1453,
were beginning their more than century-long bid for supremacy in the
Mediterranean. Alfonso V was wise enough to settle Italian affairs for a
while by co-signing, together with Florence, the Papacy, Venice, and Milan,
the other four great Italian powers, the treaty of Lodi, which sought to pre-
vent any of the main political players in the peninsula from establishing
a hegemony. It gave Italy a breathing space for four decades; it did not pre-
vent, however, the entry of foreign powers into the peninsula in 1494 and
Italy’s eventual domination by Spain and France. When Alfonso V died in
1458, admired by poets and those he so liberally patronized at his lavish
court in Naples, his son Ferrante inherited the Neapolitan kingdom, while
the king’s brother, John, who was by then 60, inherited the Crown of Aragon. 17
John II (1458–1479)
From disruptive high nobleman in Castile and Infante of Aragon to king
of Navarre, the life of John II, Ferdinand of Antequera’s second son, spanned
most of the fifteenth century. Born in 1398 and benefiting from his father’s
influence in Castilian affairs as regent of Castile and from his mother’s
extraordinary wealth and position, John was, first and foremost, a great
Castilian lord. As such, even after becoming the consort king of Navarre
in 1425, he kept throughout most of his long life an unwelcome finger on
the pulse of Castilian affairs. We have already met the Infante John, as one
of the proud Infantes of Aragon, and described some of his conflicts with
Alvaro de Luna, with his own brother, the Infante Henry, and with an ever-
changing cast of noble factions for almost three decades before becoming
the count-king of the Crown of Aragon. But although Castile remained upper-
most in his mind, John engaged vigorously with the affairs of the Crown
of Aragon’s expansive world and with Navarre’s troubled inheritance.
Having become king of Navarre through his marriage to Blanca in 1425,
he held on to the Navarrese throne even after his wife’s death in 1441 and
against the opposition of his own son and rightful heir Charles (Carlos)
of Viana. From 1441 to Charles’ early death 20 years later, John struggled
to maintain his control over the Navarrese realm. When he died in 1479,
Navarre devolved to his great-grandson, Francis (Francisco), a grandson
of Gaston of Foix (who had married Leonor, the last living descendant of108 Toward the Rule of the Catholic Monarchs, 1412 –1469
John and Blanca). With this Navarre returned to French rule for a short
while until annexed by Spain in 1512. 18 Besides his Navarrese duties, John
served as representative of his brother in Aragon in the 1430s and beyond.
He fought at the side of his brother in the disastrous defeat off Ponza in
1435 and, together with Alfonso V, was carried off to Milan as a prisoner.
At his brother’s behest, he served as royal proxy for Aragonese interests –
though it was mostly about his status in Castile that he worried – until the
Infantes of Aragon were soundly defeated (with the Infante Henry dying
of wounds suffered in the battlefield) at Olmedo in 1445.
Inheriting the Crown of Aragon from his brother in 1458, he still
retained, by the terms of Alfonso V’s will, rule over Sardinia and Sicily, though
Naples, which had drained so much of Aragonese–Catalan resources,
went, as noted earlier, to Alfonso V’s bastard son. John II’s long battle with
his own son, Charles of Viana, over the Navarrese succession spilled over
into the internal affairs of the Crown of Aragon and broader peninsular
politics. Siding with Charles or aiding him became a way for Catalans, French,
Castilians, and others to undermine John II. Through his many years of
scheming and troublemaking in Castile and in the service of his brother,
John II had failed to make many friends in Aragon. His concession of
Roussillon and Cerdagne, traditional Catalan lands, to Louis XI, king of
France, at the treaty of Bayonne in May 1462 only increased Catalan anger
– particularly since the treaty was to provide John with French support in
crushing his own subjects.
What followed was confusing indeed. The Catalans, rightly incensed by
John II’s actions, offered the rule of Catalonia to Henry IV of Castile, renoun-
cing their fealty to John II. Though Henry IV was the wrong choice in many
ways, this act of defiance and rejection of John II was symptomatic of
the wider political problems confronting the king; even more, it reflected
the intractable nature of the Crown of Aragon’s internal political structure.
If to these problems one adds the continuing economic difficulties in Aragon
and, most of all, in Catalonia, one could see that John II had his hands
full. When Henry IV of Castile abandoned the Catalan interests at Louis
XI’s request, Catalan leaders sought to make other deals. First they tried
Louis XI himself, but his price, the annexation of Catalonia to France, was
too steep for Catalan pride and independence, as it proved to be again in
1640. And then they turned to Portugal for a ruler. When that also failed,
they sought out René of Anjou, count of Provence and Alfonso V’s former
rival for Naples. It was a quite hopeless enterprise.
As Bisson has argued, this political and “constitutional” crisis – for after
all the conflict was also about the right governance for the Principality
and the nature of the relationship between king and subjects – turned intoToward the Rule of the Catholic Monarchs, 1412 –1469 109
a civil war. 19 Early in the struggle, opposition to John II and support for
Charles of Viana was so adamant as to unite the fiercest of rivals, the Busca
and the Biga, in defense of Catalan liberties. This did not bode well for
the king.
All these confusing sets of alliances and betrayals opened the door to
war in Catalonia, as John II sought to impose his undisputed rule in the
region only to meet fierce Catalan resistance. Armed conflicts, which drew
outside powers at different stages in the long and protracted struggle,
were further complicated by the Crown’s ambiguous position regarding the
remença rebellion. And to add one more ingredient to the pot, the Queen
Juana Enríquez (second wife to John II and a member of a powerful Castilian
magnate family) and their son Ferdinand, heir to the Realms of Aragon,
also took prominent roles in these shifting political alliances. In the end,
with Barcelona besieged, the city surrendered in 1472, and John II, with
some exceptions, proved to be a magnanimous and intelligent winner,
ratifying most of the Catalan liberties. By then, however, Barcelona’s
economic life had been crushed; its population had fallen precipitously. In
the meantime, Ferdinand had been married to Isabella of Castile for three
years. Although Valencia and Aragon broke briefly away in rebellion, and
the old king tottered slowly toward his death, the marriage changed every-
thing. With John II’s passing a new era opened: one dominated by Castile’s
military superiority, Atlantic ventures, and the taming of the Castilian nobil-
ity. The Realms of Aragon would suffer from then onwards from benign
neglect. But that is yet another story. 20Chapter 6
The Sinews of Power
Administration, Politics, and Display
Disorder and repeated challenges to royal authority, the selfishness of the
nobility, and the enduring free-for-all to grab as much of the resources of
the kingdom as possible seem to have been the only discernible pattern of
political life throughout the Spanish realms, though Castile seems to have
fared the worst during the period between 1300 and the reign of the Catholic
Monarchs. Nonetheless, in spite of the perception of doom that pervades
most political narratives of that century and a half, certain trends and innova-
tions – both in the Crown’s actual political program and in its administrative
innovations and reforms – provide a more positive counter-narrative to
the previous relentless accounts of rebellions, wars, and disasters.
For one, throughout the period under examination kings (or their favorites
acting in their own interests) sought to expand and assert their authority
over their subjects and over the rather unyielding institutional structures
of their respective realms. Noble factions, responding to these royal policies,
attempted to thwart these efforts and to accumulate as many privileges and
as much property (at the expense of the Crown) as possible. But note that
privileges and material gifts came from the Crown, and what could be wrested
from kings by force or as part of political deals could also be taken away
– as the Catholic kings did – in those periods when royal authority was in
the ascendant. Urban elites and representatives assemblies (Cortes, Corts)
worked their own deals, equally seeking to advance their own privileges
and oligarchic interests. Yet, agreements between Crown and cities were,
on the whole, far more beneficial to the kings than dealing with the
numerous noble factions vying with each other for a share of profits, lands,
privileges, and other goodies. The immense majority of the people, often
voiceless in these political processes, just hoped to avoid getting caught up
in the crossfire as the three main political actors – Crown, nobility, and
urban interests – competed for the prize.The Sinews of Power
111
One should note that ecclesiastics, who had representation in both
the Cortes and the royal court, do not appear prominently in this story.
By the fourteenth and fifteenth centuries high Church dignitaries had become
fully part of the internecine struggles of the nobility. The scions of great
noble families, these bishops and great abbots’ political aims and actions
often reflected those of their own familial clans. Church reform, when
it came, did not spring from ecclesiastical concerns with the plight of the
people below. Rarely were these high Church officials real shepherds to their
flocks. As we may remember from chapter 2, those at the bottom were
represented as sheep, those at the top as wolves. Bishops, archbishops,
and powerful abbots were, more often than not, among the wolves. Their
flocks, spoiled and tortured by the nobility, taxed to death by kings and
their masters, pinned their hopes on a strong monarch.
We must digress here for a bit. From the thirteenth century onwards –
and this was indeed one of the main issues of contention throughout the
two following centuries – the Spanish realms stood at a crossroads (which
seems like a long time to stand at a crossroads). In general terms this meant
defining the very nature of governance. Was there a sense of public respon-
sibility, of the “public,” that is? Were there lands that belonged to the
kingdom, lands that could not be alienated, as opposed to lands belong-
ing to the king qua individual? Surely if the history briefly told in the three
previous chapters teaches us anything is that the nature of royal holdings
was always contested in this period, and this fluidity depended on polit-
ical circumstances, the weakness of the king, and other factors. Nonetheless,
the sense of Castile and the Realms of Aragon emerging as territorial
entities and the growth of regional and kingdom-wide identities worked
as powerful incentives for the slow emergence of new ways of conceiving
the kingdom and royal authority.
New feelings and ideas about patria (fatherland or motherland) or tierra
(the land) found echoes in ambitious legislative programs – as for example
the failed legal reforms of Alfonso X in the mid-thirteenth century and the
successful legislation of Alfonso XI in 1348 – or in the assertive claims of
the Aragonese and Catalans to their ancient “constitutional” privileges or
to a monarchical authority based upon a commonly agreed pact or contract.
What was being decided (and re-decided in a constant give and take) in the
thirteenth century and afterwards was the nature and extent of royal power
and the relationship between the king (or queen) and his or her people.
In the mid-thirteenth century, it appeared that kings would win the
day, but the ascendancy of rulers such as Ferdinand III and James I was
either short-lived, as in the case of the former, replaced by his politically
ineffectual son Alfonso X, or did not have staying power, as was the case112 The Sinews of Power
in the Crown of Aragon. Noble, and in Catalonia urban, resistance to royal
encroachment and claims to power filled the interstices created by royal
minorities, social and economic upheavals, and international strife. The
outcome was never certain. The final success of Ferdinand and Isabella in
Castile (for the Crown of Aragon was just too difficult to reform and was
left to the enjoyment of its ancient privileges and to enduring neglect) was
never a given. Yet the kings of the Spanish realms, like their counterparts
in other medieval realms, had tools at their disposal which eventually tilted
the conflict in their favor. None was as powerful a tool as the incipient
royal bureaucracies.
We should not proceed without a caveat. In this chapter and through-
out this book, I have used terms such as Crown, kings, monarchs, royal
authority. All these terms can and should be problematized. By kings I of
course also mean queens. After all, both Castile and the Crown of Aragon
had some very successful queens. Some of them ruled completely on their
own, as was the case with Urraca and Isabella in Castile. In the Crown of
Aragon, queens served as lieutenants or almost viceregal representatives quite
effectively, as we shall see below and as we have seen in previous chapters.
Other queens in Castile and Aragon were effective regents, as was the case
with María de Molina, and they proved to be far more capable than many
of their male counterparts. It may not be an exaggeration to say that the
best kings in Spain were usually female. The terms king, Crown, and monarch
are always meant here to encompass that complex system, often implying
co-rulership, that was medieval kingship. It was never as simple as I have
conveyed here for the sake of brevity. Much more so when the craft of
ruling was so deeply dependent on, and embedded in, the workings of
royal bureaucracies.
Administering the Realms
Collecting taxes and restoring order bring us face to face with the manner
in which Spanish kings or their agents laid the foundations for new ways
of ruling, administering the realm, and placing the Crown on a more secure
fiscal footing in the late Middle Ages. In the midst of what seemed like
undisputed anarchy in Castile and weakening royal power in the Realms
of Aragon, innovative administrative transformations took place. These
measures strengthened the rulers’ hand over the next century and a half
and made possible, at least in Castile, significant political reforms. These
institutional developments, veritable sinews of power, were not always
obvious to contemporaries and were slow in the making. They can be groupedThe Sinews of Power
113
in broad categories: administrative practices, fiscal reforms, military and
territorial innovations, and regulating and defining the relationship of
the Crown with other orders within the realm. As is always the case, the
boundaries between these categories were always fluid; it is indeed not easy
to study these developments without reference to other aspects of a broad
range of transformations propelling the Spanish monarchies into the early
modern period.
Bureaucracies
Most of the bureaucratic structures found in Castile and the Crown of Aragon
had long histories. The appearance of early administrative institutions and
functions was associated with the royal court (curia regis) and the emergence
in the central period of the Middle Ages of specialized offices – constable,
chancery, seal keeper, and the like – in response to the needs of war, taxation,
and the preservation of order. Many of these offices, especially in Castile, had
been created in imitation of Muslim administrative practices and to the
present day retain their linguistic association with their Muslim origins. Such
offices as those of the alcalde, alguacil, almotacén, and others are obvious
examples of this cultural and institutional borrowing.
Although bureaucracies are synonymous with the emergence of royal
power in the medieval West, 1 the great Christian conquests in the south
and the Aragonese–Catalan expansion into the Mediterranean in the
thirteenth century made necessary new administrative practices and led
to innovative approaches to the administration of the realm. 2 Writing on
these themes, I am guided, most of all, by Luis García de Valdeavellano’s
magisterial Curso de las instituciones. 3 As was the case elsewhere through-
out the medieval West, kings, or in the case of Catalonia counts, led and
supervised, at least in theory, the entire administrative structure. But, as
bureaucracies became larger and more sophisticated, the idea that kings
could keep their hand on all governmental affairs became ludicrous, especi-
ally considering the peripatetic nature of medieval kingship or the exigencies
of the Reconquest and Mediterranean affairs. Alfonso V, as we already know,
spent most of his reign in Naples. His wife, María of Castile, acting as his
lieutenant in Catalonia, effectively ran the Principality with the help of royal
agents. Rulers, therefore, began to delegate power, while at the same time
assigning inspectors (inquisitores or pesquisidores) to guarantee compliance
with royal edicts. Although royal inquisitors did not prevent the breakdown
of order, they projected royal power throughout the realm and served as
a deterrent to the growing autonomy of royal bureaucrats. Keeping royal
administrators in check could take several forms. Alfonso XI had some of114 The Sinews of Power
his most important servants executed for malfeasance or too much inde-
pendence. Henry II (Trastámara), fresh from his victory in the civil war
against his brother Peter, sought to assert firm royal control over royal officials,
having his measures endorsed by the Cortes. 4 In fact, the Cortes of Toro
in 1371, as well as others of the early Trastámara Cortes, showed a remark-
able desire, albeit often unsuccessful, to reform administrative structures
and to set the realm in order. Later rulers benefited from these efforts. Along
the same lines, royal officials – now slowly on their way to becoming public
officials – had to render accounts of their years of service. Called residencia
in Castile and purga de taula in the Crown of Aragon, the law commanded
royal officials to render careful accounts of all the transactions undertaken
during their period of office. 5
The royal court
Around the Spanish kings a series of important offices evolved from earlier
times and became formalized from the 1280s onwards. Including the con-
stable, royal notary, chancillería, and treasury, as well as other offices directly
associated with court ceremonial, the royal court had gained a formidable
number of prominent royal agents by the early fourteenth century. Not only
did these powerful men – most of them representing either great magnate
families or Church dignitaries, though, as was the case in the fifteenth cen-
tury, others were newcomers – provide, with the help of university-trained
lesser bureaucrats, administrative continuity and long-term planning, but
they also enhanced the prestige and “public” image of the monarch. The
downside to this was that some of these offices became points of contention
for great families, competing with each other for direct access to the king
or, as was the case in Castile, for control of the monarch himself. In some
cases, some offices became associated with one family, as the powerful de
Haro family did with the office of constable in the fourteenth century or
as the great noble house of the Moncada did with the position of senechal
in Catalonia.
The royal court was a powerful administrative and political structure.
In her formidable book, Rita Costa Gomes describes a Portuguese court
populated by representatives of the great noble families in the kingdom and
adjacent realms, ecclesiastics, merchants and urban representatives, Jews,
Muslims, numberless servants, children and adolescents brought up at the
king’s expense. She has identified by name as many as 265 individuals
in 1462, and one must suppose that an equal or greater number could be
found in the royal entourage of Castilian and Aragonese kings. In fact, the
Castilian accounts of 1293 – 4 yield a large number of names of servantsThe Sinews of Power
115
and higher royal officials, providing the tools for partially reconstructing
Castile’s royal court staff at the end of the thirteenth century. 6
There is another aspect of royal courts that is pertinent to this discus-
sion. The itinerant Spanish royal courts served as sites for noble exchanges.
As Costa Gomes has shown, the Iberian nobility circulated among the penin-
sular courts. Their interests, connections, and political agendas transcended
the confines of emerging “national” kingdoms. By the fifteenth century,
with the increasing popularity of knight-errantry and pas d’armes, one could
speak of an international noble class. Catalan knights could be found in
English jousts. French and German knights-errant traveled and fought
throughout the peninsula. Marriages between great noble houses across
the boundaries of kingdoms strengthened these ties and ran counter to the
interest of centralizing-minded kings. Yet these noble connections mitigated,
to a certain extent, the bitterness of conflicts between Iberian realms. In many
other ways as well, royal largesse and protection for noble visitors to indi-
vidual courts legitimized and enhanced royal power. Rituals of hospitality,
gift-giving, and patronage of courtly events such as jousts, pas d’armes, and
other festivities became indispensable parts of the complex mechanisms
by which kings did eventually overcome noble resistance and gained or forced
their collaboration with, and obedience to, royal authority.
To summarize, bound by growing court ceremonials and festive cycles
after 1300 (see chapter 8), one could easily see the significant role that court
society – and the court itself – played in giving a decisive advantage to Spanish
kings, as it did to other late medieval rulers, in overcoming what seemed
the insurmountable opposition of other orders in society. In addition, though
the entire court did not always accompany the king in his travels through-
out the kingdom, royal itinerancy, as Costa Gomes shows, helped fix the
territory and projected royal power throughout most of the realm or, at
least, to strategic or sensitive regions of the kingdom. Subjects liked to have
their kings around. Alfonso V’s long stay in Naples was the cause of endless
bickering by his subjects, who clamored for his return, though in reality his
wife was a far better administrator and ruler than he could have been.
In Castile, the cities of Valladolid, Burgos, Segovia, Avila, Toledo, and
Seville served as “hosts” to a monarchy without a fixed capital (there would
not be an official capital in Castile until the designation of Madrid as
such in the second half of the sixteenth century). In the Crown of Aragon,
Barcelona, Zaragoza, and Valencia had long been traditional administra-
tive and ritual centers. They drew frequent visits from the king or his rep-
resentatives. This peripatetic behavior also provided Spanish kings with
excellent opportunities to supervise the workings of local administrators,
maintain or renew relations with local elites, and strengthen alliances with116 The Sinews of Power
local nobles throughout the territory. In the same manner in which ritual
and festivals bound the high nobility to the Crown, royal visits were part
of complex negotiations between the king and his people that reiterated
principles of mutuality and well-defined responsibilities. Royal visits were
expensive affairs, threatening and exhausting the local economies, but
they were part of a quid pro quo in which towns and local elites received
rewards for their hospitality in the form of new or renewed privileges
or individual grants. And since royal visits were always accompanied by
elaborate ceremonies and festivities, they provided the Crown with yet another
opportunity to display its superiority or symbolic advantages over rivals.
Although many of these patterns can be found in earlier centuries, it was
only after 1300 that such events became formalized and recorded in the
chronicles in a systematic fashion. And even though the kings faced endless
opposition from nobles and cities (the latter certainly in Catalonia) during
this period, itinerancy, entries, and festivals lay the ground work for later
political developments which clearly benefited the Crown. Yet, at the
end, the power of kings rested on the mundane and day-to-day business
of running the realm.
Local Administration and the Law
If the court and royal bureaucracy, as they perambulated through the Spanish
realms, gave great advantages to the Crown, it was the continuity of royal
agents on the ground doing their work, collecting taxes, giving judgments,
keeping the peace, and other such activities that firmly established the flow
of government and accustomed subjects to compliance with royal edicts.
These subjects would, of course, rebel from time to time; and in the century
under study more than from time to time, but there was seldom any serious
questioning as to the right of kings to order their realms. Even more effec-
tively, royal administration was replicated at the local level by municipal
and village councils. Although quite litigious and often at odds with the
Crown about their privileges, tax exemptions, and royal agents’ disregard
for these grants, local governments fully accepted the hierarchy of power
established by law, tradition, and practice. In doing so, they also but-
tressed the superiority of the monarch within the realm. Again, struggles
occurred, but everyone agreed on the rules. And these rules on how to
govern, who owed what to whom, and other such elements of medieval
rulership rested upon a long tradition of fueros (charters) granted to local-
ities at their foundation or reconquest. Ranging from the great Usatges of
Barcelona to the ancient Fuero juzgo (a translation of the Lex visigothorum),The Sinews of Power
117
or to quite novel legislative initiatives, such as Alfonso X’s Fuero real or
Alfonso XI’s Ordenamiento de Alcalá de Henares, these texts became tools
in the struggle for (and against) local autonomy. Reliance on them, how-
ever, only reiterated the unique power of kings to make law. In addition
to this, the frequent ordinances of the Cortes or Corts provided a con-
tinuous body of rules and regulations for the governance and legal existence
of the kingdom.
The fourteenth and fifteenth centuries were particularly fertile in enunci-
ating principles for the governance of the realm and in establishing
structures of power that led, at least in Castile, to stronger monarchical
authority. But even where this was not the case, as in Aragon and
Catalonia, legislative actions and royal edicts helped to define the relations
between kings and their people. When Alfonso XI carried out his ambitious
legal reforms, the Ordenamiento de Alcalá de Henares, in 1348, or when
Catalan rebels placed humiliating limitations on royal rule and reasserted the
primacy of the Usatges and the Corts’ monitoring power over royal decisions,
we witness what Weber, in a felicitous phrase, described as the “routiniza-
tion of power.” The setting of rules of governance fully agreed by all (or
almost all) parties and the relations between ruler and ruled became part
of mutually accepted administrative routines. One can list the benchmarks
of this legal evolution in Castile: from the setting of the appropriate
hierarchy of legal texts in 1348 with the reintroduction of the previously
rejected Siete partidas as a supplemental code, to the king’s reserving to
himself the power to make, change, and interpret the law. 7 Thus, in spite
of the cycles of violence and challenges to royal power, these legal and admini-
strative reforms propelled the Spanish realms into a very different polit-
ical world from that of earlier centuries. Legal developments, however,
would have been useless without those enforcing the law and promoting
an expansion of royal power and prerogatives throughout the land.
The king’s men
In a soon-to-be-published book, Francisco Hernández (one of the most
insightful scholars of thirteenth-century Castile) explores the royal bureaucracy’s
complexity in this period. One gets a strong sense of the growing sophis-
tication of royal administration in the royal accounts of 1293 – 4. The
same, perhaps to an even greater degree, could be said of the Crown of
Aragon. In the eastern kingdoms there was a strong notarial tradition and
Mediterranean-influenced bureaucratic practices. But the questions remain:
what were these offices, who were these royal officials, and how did they
administer the Spanish realms?118 The Sinews of Power
One of the most important positions in the Crown of Aragon was the
governmental lieutenancy. Ruling over motley kingdoms and possessions
ranging from Aragon, Catalonia, Valencia, and the kingdom of Majorca to
the Italian Aragonese–Catalan possessions, the Crown of Aragon’s kings found
it impossible to rule directly over these dispersed and different kingdoms.
Even their perambulation from one realm to another could not satisfy the
needs of government, nor please its people. From the thirteenth century
onwards the Crown of Aragon had developed a system which delegated
power to a member of the royal family to rule specific realms in the absence
of the king. Heirs to the Crown or princes of the blood were often the people
designated to hold the position. Peter III did so in Catalonia between 1258
and 1276, just before assuming the throne. John II, Ferdinand’s father, did
so for four years between 1454 and 1458. Royal brothers might also be called
on to fulfill this function, as was the case with the aforementioned John
II (who was also the heir to the throne), or of the two Peters who held
the lieutenancy of Catalonia in 1289 –95 and in 1354 – 5 respectively. The
uniqueness of this institution, however, rests on the fact that queens were
as often given these tasks. Seven of them held the lieutenancy of Catalonia
between 1310 and 1477, and two of them, Violant de Bar and María of
Castile, did so for a considerable span of time. As such, these lieutenants
functioned as representatives of the kings and fulfilled all the functions of
the ruler in the absence of their husband. María, who ruled Catalonia at
a critical time (between 1420 and 1453, with some interruptions) while
Alfonso V remained in Naples, did so far better than most of her male coun-
terparts. 8 Clearly such practices were put to very good use by the Catholic
Monarchs and their Habsburg descendants through the office of the viceroy.
In the peninsula, in Italy, in the Low Countries, and in the New World,
the Aragonese–Catalan administrative model became essential to the
running of the Spanish empire.
Other positions, though not as glamorous or influential as that of the
administrative lieutenancy, played significant roles in the managing of the
realms. One of the most important royal agents was the merino. A regional
administrator, tax collector, judicial official, and, at least in theory, careful
watchman over royal prerogatives, the merino had jurisdiction over a ter-
ritorial unit (the merindad), an area comparable to the English shire or French
bailliage. As such the merino – an office that existed under different names
in Castile, Aragon, Navarre, and Catalonia (there with the name of veguer)
– exercised wide powers in a well-defined political and fiscal territory. First
and foremost the emergence of the merindad signals the Spanish realms’
division into well-defined administrative units for easier governance and,
most of all, to prevent the concentration of power in the hands of a royalThe Sinews of Power
119
official administering a territory too large or rich for the comfort of
the Crown.
In 1351, in the wake of the plague, Peter I of Castile ordered an exten-
sive survey of the royal, ecclesiastical, and seigniorial rights and fiscal
resources of all of northern Castile. The Libro becerro de las behetrías, as
the manuscript (and now published) record of the inquest is known, reflects
the ability of the Crown to send numerous royal agents into the most
isolated villages in northern Castile. In the mid-fourteenth century, this
incomplete survey of northern Castile listed fifteen merindades. Some, such
as the merindad of Aguilar de Campoo, extended over vast territories in
the nearby mountains and plain and included 262 different villages. 9 What
the Becerro reveals is the division of the realm into regions whose contours
were determined by geography and history. These northern merindades
corresponded to earlier stages in the historical development of the king-
dom and reflected the ways in which traffic, commercial and military, flowed
from one town to another. It was a topography of wayfaring as much as
a topography of power.
Responsible for such vast and diverse geographical spaces in a region in
which transportation was not always easy (as was the case in northern Aragon
and Catalonia), the merinos were organized in a hierarchical scheme. The
merino mayor, or head merino, supervised the administration of regional
officials. Each merino or bajuli (another term used in Catalonia) worked
in turn with a bevy of subordinates, known, depending the period, as
sayones, tenientes, or honores. This elaborate territorial organization was
replicated in the semi-autonomous urban centers with alcaldes, merinos,
sayones, and a complex system of subordinate offices. In some cases,
certainly after 1300, royal alcaldes bridged the distance between kingdom-
wide and local administrative structures. In Castile, from the mid-thirteenth
century onwards, the adelantado de la frontera (a military official in charge
of defending border areas) rose to a prominent position within the royal
administration. Because of the fluid conditions found in the liminal ter-
ritories between Christian and Muslim Spain, the adelantados exploited the
position to their own advantage, as did Don Juan Manuel in 1320s and
1330s Murcia.
Castilian administrative arrangements could be found, with some local
variations, throughout the Spanish realms. There were of course exceptions.
In the Basque provinces (part of the larger kingdom of Castile), peculiar
institutions existed. They were grounded in ancient privileges and reflected
the aristocratic character of Basque society. In Aragon the kingdom’s regional
administrative units were called honores or universities (from the concept
of guilds) and also merindades. Juntas, a form of hermandad or league of120 The Sinews of Power
Aragonese municipalities or communities, became a fixture of Aragonese
royal administration and civic life from the late thirteenth century onward.
In addition, because of the frequent absences of the monarch as he
attended to the needs of other realms, in Aragon, Catalonia, and Valencia,
a royal representative, usually a member of the royal family, stood, as already
noted, in representation of the king. In Catalonia the equivalent of the
merindades were the vegueries. By the early fourteenth century there were
18 such administrative units: each of them with a veguer, fulfilling the
same role as that of the merino in Castile. Because of the fierce claims to
autonomy upheld by most Catalan communities, the veguer shared respon-
sibilities with a local magistrate, the battle. A whole subset of lesser func-
tionaries or parallel fiscal bureaucracies developed from the thirteenth
century onwards, buttressing royal authority at a time when the monarchy
faced stiff resistance from nobles and cities.
The fourteenth and fifteenth centuries represented a critical period in
the formalization of administrative and fiscal institutions. Without this, the
political reforms of the late fifteenth century could not have taken place.
These developments, in spite of frequent setbacks and reversals, took place
along parallel tracks: (1) the growing assertion of royal prerogatives and
new legal elaborations defining the relation between Crown and people;
(2) the introduction of new administrative practices and offices which became
an integral part of statecraft; (3) the inroads made by kings, certainly in
Castile, in controlling the fiscal and political resources of urban centers and
in curtailing their autonomy. Although the Castilian monarchy proved to
be the most successful – if a somewhat centralized kingdom is the measure
for success – the Crown of Aragon was, by far, the most innovative, the most
prescient in imagining a federation of realms, in limiting royal authority,
and in working out, through the system of lieutenancies, a collective and
geographically far-reaching monarchy.
The Crown and the cities
One must dispel once and for all the notion that medieval kings (or
queens) could rule autonomously, without interference from their subjects.
There were no absolute rulers in Spain until probably the eighteenth
century, and then only as a French import. What we witness in the late
Middle Ages is a tug of war between different groups in society, which
in Castile eventually led to the Crown gaining the upper hand, while in
the Crown of Aragon, and above all Catalonia, resulted in a reassertion of
municipal autonomy and local government. Allow me to present just one
single example of what is a very complex topic and which we may be ableThe Sinews of Power
121
to explore below from the perspective of the relation between the Crown
and the Cortes or Corts.
In Castile the Crown had a long-standing alliance with the cities. From
the twelfth century onwards the Castilian kings bestowed on the cities and
on their urban ruling oligarchies numerous privileges. In return the king
benefited from the military support of urban militias in raids against
Muslim lands and, by 1300 and afterwards, in opposing rebellious nobles.
After the conquest of Seville the Castilian rulers entered into a partnership
with the urban centers to oppose the nobles’ growing ambitions and
power. 10 But the Crown conceived of this partnership as an unequal one.
Under Sancho IV the Castilian Crown tried to intervene in municipal affairs
by creating a parallel municipal body, the Jurado or jury (jurymen), or
by remitting to the royal court or to royal judges (alcaldes del rey) many
judicial matters hitherto under local jurisdiction. Growing fiscal needs as
the economy collapsed and rising unrest within the cities – disfranchised
citizens opposing ruling elites or internecine warfare between patrician
factions – led Alfonso XI to name regidores, royal agents who now became
municipal administrators, throughout Castile in 1345 and afterwards.
Although in reality most of the regidores were selected from the same
oligarchic groups that had already monopolized power within the cities,
Alfonso XI made sure to appoint enough outsiders to guarantee a royal
oversight of municipal councils. Moreover, even if the same elites still pre-
served their power within the cities, they did so now as agents of the Crown:
their power coming directly from the king and not from their own social
and economic standing within their respective cities. 11 With all the caveats
that such sweeping assertions deserve, one could still argue that municipal
autonomy in Castile came to an end by the mid-fourteenth century. This
is confirmed by the sorry role that representative assemblies played in
the turbulent years ahead. In the Crown of Aragon, as always, the story
was different.
The king and the Cortes (Corts)
The contractual nature of the Spanish realms was most evident in the ebb
and flow of relations, agreements, and disagreements between the Crown
and the kingdoms’ representative assemblies. The late Middle Ages witnessed
dramatic shifts in these relations as royal prerogatives and the rights,
privileges, and duties of each of the different orders within the realm became
either defined or redefined according to political circumstances. This is
not a monochrome story since each of Spain’s political entities – Castile,
Navarre, and the different kingdoms comprising the Crown of Aragon122 The Sinews of Power
– had its own representative assembly, its own language of governance, and
different administrative styles and structures.
Spain had the longest tradition of representative assemblies in the
medieval West, pre-dating by a century or more similar developments in
England and France. In brief, emerging from the gathering of the curia regis
(the king’s court), these assemblies became general Cortes or true repres-
entative assemblies when urban centers sent procurators to their meetings
at the request of the king. This happened in León, the site of the first official
Cortes for which we have extant evidence, in 1188. The presence of urban
representatives provided a convenient forum in which to air grievances, and
brought representatives from leading towns together with each other and
the king. Far more important, urban procurators approved subsidies for
a monarchy which always had an insatiable appetite for new funds, and
voted on taxes and other fiscal matters essential for the realm’s governance.
Historians have long argued that representative assemblies came into
being because of fiscal necessities, above all, the maintenance of a stable
coinage. And this serves as a reminder that in the Middle Ages, rulers raised
funds and imposed taxes with the consent of the ruled. I know that the
classical formulation, enunciated by Bartolus in the mid-fourteenth cen-
tury – the famous quod omnes tangit . . . , roughly rendered as “that which
touches all, should be decided by all” – evokes “constitutional” arrange-
ments and “democratic” participation. These medieval arrangements were
far from that. Those who paid taxes – merchants, artisans, peasants, and
the like – also often (especially the oligarchic elites) collected tribute and
profited from their role as interlocutors for a vast sea of those below
who had no representation. Urban procurators, who from the late twelfth
century onwards represented only the upper levels of urban society and
nobody else, also engaged in direct negotiations with the Crown and received
frequent confirmations of their privileges – an important symbolic and real
requirement in the uncertain world of the Middle Ages – tax exemptions,
and other grants. It was often a ferocious negotiation, and the ordinances
of the Cortes, sent to all the towns for keeping in their respective archives,
do not fully reflect the give and take of these meetings, often held during
very troubled times.
Of course, the tone of the ordinances and, far more significant, the results,
changed from year to year, reflecting political contexts. They also changed
from realm to realm. In Castile the Crown’s relations with the Cortes swung
from almost total royal dependence on urban procurators and leagues of
cities to neglect and abuse of the institution by rulers safely ensconced
in their power base. In the Crown of Aragon, above all in Aragon and
Catalonia, the kings and queens dealt with their respective Corts gingerly.The Sinews of Power
123
These representative assemblies could prove quite cantankerous and
demanding; the Crown had little leeway and often had to abide by the Corts’
demands. Many of the privileges granting wide autonomy and jurisdiction
to the Corts had been wrested from the Aragonese kings or, in some cases,
given quite freely at a time when the Crown of Aragon’s Mediterranean
ventures required a free hand at home and some semblance of military
and fiscal support. Reversing the contractual nature of the relationship
was very difficult and, at times, as Olivares and Philip IV found to their
chagrin in 1640, impossible.
The Cortes or Corts had gained, often after a great deal of conflict, the
right to be summoned on a regular basis. The frequency of their meetings,
however, changed from kingdom to kingdom and depended on many
different factors. For example, in Castile the Cortes were to meet every two
years. At the gathering of the three orders at Palencia, held in 1313 in the
midst of widespread violence and conflict over the regency of the young
Alfonso XI, the regents agreed to call the Cortes into session at least every
two years between the feast of St. Michael (September 29) and All Saints
(November 1), giving the right to high ecclesiastics and royal advisers (which
by that time also included urban representatives) to do so if the king
or regents failed to meet this obligation. 12 This, of course, often fell by
the wayside or was utterly ignored. In times of crisis, these representative
assemblies could meet as often as twice a year, as they did in 1313, and
contending factions within a regency could, and did, call competing Cortes
on their own. Or they could not meet at all, as was the case when the Castilian
kings had the upper hand and a firm control of the realm. For example,
there were around eight Cortes held during Alfonso XI’s minority between
1312 and 1322, a very troubled time indeed, and only nine between 1322
and 1350, when the king had restored some order. For most of the 1330s
Alfonso XI did not summon the Cortes even once.
In the Crown of Aragon, the Cortes of Aragon was to meet every year
in Zaragoza according to the Royal Privilege of Aragon (1283), or every
two years anywhere else in the kingdom as mandated by a royal edict in
1307. Catalonia’s Corts also alternated between mandated meetings every
year or every three years. Both in Aragon and, far more so, in Catalonia
the time span between regular meetings of the Cortes or Corts did not mean
the absence of a strict surveillance of royal actions by the Corts’ repres-
entatives. Unlike Castile, where the king enjoyed a fairly free hand in the
affairs of the realm while away from the Cortes, in the eastern kingdoms the
Corts selected representatives to a standing committee, which served as
a permanent representation of the assemblies’ authority and as a standing
deterrent to royal policies which these representatives considered harmful124 The Sinews of Power
to the realm, or to royal claims to unrestricted authority. An innovation
of the late fourteenth and early fifteenth centuries, the Diputació del General
(Corts) or Generalitat, as it was known in Catalonia, or Diputación in Aragon,
these smaller and permanent offshoots of the Corts became a true coun-
terpart to royal power and the embodiment of an emerging Catalan and
Aragonese sovereignty (if one can truly use the term of this period). In
Catalonia, for example, the Generalitat’s jurisdiction extended through
a wide-ranging field of activities, from fiscal and administrative to judicial
and military. Similar institutions, though less powerful than in Catalonia,
emerged in Valencia as well. I would like to re-emphasize the significance
of these developments within the context of Spanish and western European
history. In Barcelona today the building of the Generalitat (a modern
substitute for the ancient original building) still dominates the civic spaces
of the city, proudly attesting to its enduring presence as the embodiment
of Catalan political identity. This is quite a remarkable development for
an institution born during the fourteenth-century crises and struggles against
royal authority.
As to membership in the Cortes/Corts, in Castile the three orders of
society – the high nobility, the high Church dignitaries, and urban repres-
entatives – constituted a full and legal meeting of the Cortes. Not all cities
and towns had representation at the Cortes, and as the Castilian kings gained
the upper hand they sought to limit the number of towns represented, as
well as the number of representatives. As we saw in chapter 3, in 1315
as many as 100 towns sent representatives to the gathering of the Cortes
at Burgos. Some localities, such as Avila, sent as many as 16 representa-
tives (though the representation also reflected the factional division of the
city’s ruling oligarchy). At the Burgalese Cortes of 1315 a wide hermandad
of town representatives and lesser nobility ( fijosdalgo) joined forces against
an unruly high nobility; the nature of the gathering and the ongoing strife
may have accounted for the robust showing of Leonese and Castilian towns.
Although the 1315 meeting was unusual in many respects, there is ample
evidence that the number of towns sending representatives, or even the
number of representatives from each town, varied greatly and depended
on such factors as where the gathering of the Cortes took place, what issues
were to be discussed, or even the individual towns’ willingness or unwill-
ingness to foot the high bill of sending procurators to the meetings.
Throughout the fourteenth and fifteenth centuries, as the realm’s polit-
ical dynamics changed and the direct conflict between the Crown and the
segments of the high nobility took center-stage, the role of the Cortes dimin-
ished, as did the frequency of the meetings or even the number of those
in attendance. By the time of Isabella and Ferdinand – which in many respectsThe Sinews of Power
125
stood as the culmination of a series of institutional developments with
origins in the previous 150 years – only 18 towns could send procurators
to the meetings of the Cortes, and these towns could not send more than
two procurators each, as ordered by the Crown and accepted by the Cortes
itself in 1429. 13 By slowly reducing the frequency of the meetings and
by severely curtailing the number of representatives in attendance, the
Castilian Crown ensured a more pliant Cortes, turning it into an effective
tool for ruling.
In the Realms of Aragon representation varied. In Aragon the Cortes
had four branches: one exclusively for the high nobility or magnates; a
second for the lesser nobility and masters of the military orders; a third
for ecclesiastics (bishops and influential abbots); and a final branch for
urban representatives. Although Catalonia followed this model from 1388
to 1405, the Principality, together with Valencia, maintained the traditional
representation by orders: nobles, ecclesiastics, and urban representatives.
As was the case in Castile, the number of representatives in attendance
varied depending on circumstances, but it was eventually set at two per
urban location with the exception of the capital of each of the realms
– Zaragoza, Barcelona, and Valencia – which insisted on sending five repres-
entatives each. Unlike Castile, where each town named its own represent-
atives, in the Crown of Aragon procurators to the Cortes or Corts were
either elected or designated by a lottery. This should not lead us to think
that this yielded a more “popular” or “democratic” representation. Towns
were fairly hierarchical societies, even in strife-torn Barcelona. Those
elected or chosen by a lottery came, with few exceptions, from the ranks
of the narrow elites in control of urban life.
The Language of Power: Castile
Comparing the language and tone of the Cortes’ ordinances over time
provides different perspectives. As noted earlier, the use of the vernacular
in Castile contrasts with the use of Latin in the Realms of Aragon (often
mixed with the vernacular, Catalan or mostly a form of Castilian in Aragon).
The differences, however, go beyond the language of administration and
level of political participation. The ordinances of the Cortes in Castile describe
how the king called the gathering of the three orders of society, summon-
ing a specific number of delegates from the towns, as Ferdinand IV did to
the town of Avilés in 1305 when he requested two representatives, or an
undetermined number, as was the case in 1307 and on other occasions. 14
Urban procurators came with their lists of complaints. The king listened,126 The Sinews of Power
agreeing with some of the requests (he cannot have agreed to all), and then
ordering the drafting of the ordinances that summarized the urban requests
and demanded compliance with the king’s response. When a ruler had fairly
firm control of the realm, as Alfonso XI did in 1348, he could summon
representatives to the Cortes, not to listen to their petitions and pleas, but,
with “their consent,” to enact a new and comprehensive body of laws, the
Ordenamiento de Alcalá de Henares. 15
By the late fourteenth century and afterwards the protocol in the give
and take between urban representatives and the king (or queen) at the Cortes
had changed. The Cortes of Madrid in 1393 met as Henry III’s troubled
regency came to an end, and the young king reached his majority. The
ordinances included language symptomatic of the changes that had taken
place in the previous half-century or so, in spite of what appeared to be a
weak monarchy. The ordinances, drafted by royal scribes and copied to most
towns throughout the realm, include the response of procurators to royal
questions rather than royal responses to urban complaints:
Most excellent and Catholic king, and most high and powerful prince, and
most esmerado [accomplished] and fearful lord. The knights and squires who
are in your Cortes as procurators of the cities and towns of your kingdom,
humbly and with great humility answer to your high and noble three reasons
[points made by the king] that you proposed to your Cortes on the first day
of your attendance . . . 16
Although not every Cortes included such sycophantic language, there is
little to gloss here. Such forms of addressing the ruler would have been
inconceivable a century earlier and now had become part of a formulaic
language of respect and obedience which, if not always fully realized by
the king’s rebellious Castilian subjects, articulated new discourses of
power.
The Crown of Aragon
The meetings of the Corts in the Crown of Aragon, above all in Catalonia,
were serious business. Not only do we get a mixture of Latin and Catalan,
a day-to-day account of what transpired at the meetings, that is, something
close to actual minutes of the sessions (as opposed to Castile’s summaries
presented in the final ordinances sent to towns), but the formulaic listing
– and adhesion to the proceedings – of all those present, providing a very
different feel from the Castilian experiences. In the long gathering of theThe Sinews of Power
127
Corts in Girona and Barcelona in 1358, Peter the Ceremonious came cap
in hand to request a subsidy for the “defense of the realm and of the land”
(pro defensione Regnorum et terrarum). A formulaic listing of all those
present details each of the different individuals and orders represented at
the meeting. After months of deliberation and fierce back and forth, and
a 225-page transcript (published in the nineteenth-century edition of the
Crown of Aragon’s Cortes), the king received a modest subsidy. 17 It is no
wonder that the kings of the Crown of Aragon in the fourteenth and fifteenth
centuries preferred the Mediterranean to this endless haggling with three
different Corts. In fact, queens, holding the lieutenancy of the realms of
the Principality, were the ones who often had to do business with the Corts,
as María de Luna and María of Castile did for their respective husbands.
And the Habsburg rulers of Spain often chose to go without substantial
tax income and military conscriptions to avoid having to deal with such
recalcitrant subjects.
In the end, whether in Castile or in the eastern kingdoms, the Spanish
kings’ relations with their respective Cortes set a pattern for a working
relationship between the Crown and the different orders. The meetings,
whether held frequently or not, provided a site for political exchanges, nego-
tiations, and complaints. Grievances and royal responses to the petitions
of urban procurators always focused on some vital area: justice or the absence
of it, relations with, and control of, religious minorities, abuses by royal
officials, and taxes. To explore each of these categories would engage us
in an endless and, perhaps, tedious discussion. Instead, I would beg the
reader’s patience to briefly examine the question of taxes. Fiscal policy was,
after all, one of the key responses to the crisis of late medieval society. Royal
innovations in terms of tax-collecting and expansion of royal resources was
at the root of the increased power of kings.
Taxes
As has been seen in chapter 2, new forms of warfare and governance, and
the extravagance of the royal court, engaged all medieval kings (and queens)
in endless struggles for new sources of income in the late Middle Ages. The
Crown and its agents entered into frantic, and often brutal, attempts to raise
funds. What were their methods? What were the results? Though medieval
practices of raising revenue do not come close to the thoroughness of the
modern age, the Spanish rulers had at their disposal multiple, and important,
sources of income. In the late Middle Ages, while facing a decline in the
number of taxpayers and a serious economic downturn, royal administrators128 The Sinews of Power
demonstrated an uncanny ability to find new ways of raising funds. Their
conscious actions on fiscal matters, dull as they may seem to most readers,
were central to royal efforts to thwart noble attempts to emasculate the power
of kings. Beyond that, as reluctant as the Cortes or Corts were about voting
new subsidies, urban procurators understood that the king needed money.
It was the obligation of the Cortes or Corts to provide it and/or to cooperate
in finding it. Further taxation was a continual and painful reminder to the
population at large of royal prerogatives and authority.
Spanish kings had long established their right to collect specific taxes
throughout their territories. A long time before such practices became
common in other Western realms, the kings of Castile and of the Crown
of Aragon collected territorial taxes, that is, contributions paid through-
out their realms not just from the royal domain. These taxes received the
name of terratge in Catalonia and marzadga and martiniega (from the time
of year when they were collected, either in March and/or on the feast
of St. Martin, November 11) in Castile. These dues on either households,
hearths, or arable measures were collected by royal agents or their local
representatives at set times of the year and complemented the substantial
income kings derived from their own lands. These traditional tributes had
suffered greatly over the passing of the centuries. Nobles and clerics were
exempted from most direct taxes. Sometimes they had appropriated many
of these sources of revenue for themselves. Members of the urban elites,
especially those with horses and weapons and belonging to the mounted
urban militias, also enjoyed extensive tax exemptions, as did their servants.
The very poor paid no taxes either. Moreover, over the long centuries
of Reconquest and raids against Muslim lands, the king had granted
extensive tax exemptions to those settling on the advancing frontier. All
these different exemptions from taxes became an endless source of litiga-
tion as royal agents sought to tax those who claimed to hold royal grants.
Clearly new sources of revenue were needed.
One new source of income that proved particularly profitable was
taxes related to the use of woods (montazgo, forestatge), a natural resource
rapidly on the wane throughout most of Spain. Another was the right to
pasture one flock’s (herbazgo). Although these taxes had an earlier proven-
ance, it was only in the fourteenth and fifteenth centuries that, prompted
by the spectacular take-off of wool exports and the practice of trans-
humance, they provided a steady and substantial contribution to the
monarch’s income. Kings had also regal rights over mines, salt-wells, and
other natural resources. Far more profitable was the death-grip which Spanish
rulers, Castilian kings most of all, had over the Church. Although royal
dominion over ecclesiastical income had its origins in the twelfth andThe Sinews of Power
129
thirteenth centuries, by the late Middle Ages it was outright extortion. As
Peter Linehan has brilliantly shown, the kings of Castile and, to a lesser extent,
the Crown of Aragon had almost a free hand in tapping Church income
under the pretext of launching a crusade against al Andalus, claiming as
much as one-third of all ecclesiastical income for their own pockets. 18 Kings
had also obtained from the Cortes a contribution to the maintenance of
the coinage. That is, the king promised not to devalue the coinage in return
for a contribution (moneda forera). Similarly, since in most parts of Spain
everyone was, in theory, liable for military service, exemption was gained
by paying a tax called fonsadera in Castile and huest in Aragon. 19
The Crown also collected taxes on imports and exports of goods in and
out of the kingdom. The accounts of 1293 – 4 are revealing of the fabulous
profit made by Castilian kings from the import of textiles, but goods trans-
ported across the land were also taxed along the way at internal custom houses
(tablas in Aragon, puertos secos in Castile) and upon entry into most towns.
These taxes – which became really profitable only with the emergence of
new patterns of trade in the late thirteenth century – reached unprecedented
levels in the next two centuries since both imports and exports were sub-
ject to royal taxes. In the Crown of Aragon, Catalonia above all, a high pro-
portion of these customs duties was collected by the Generalitat, though
partially paid back to the Crown in the form of subsidies that had to be
approved by the Corts. Another important profitable source of income
and far easier to collect than customs duties was the head tax and special
services imposed on Jews and Muslims. Paid annually as a direct tax by
Jews and Muslims living under Christian rule, these substantial payments
were further enhanced by the frequent tribute paid by the Nasrid rulers of
Granada to their Christian royal overlords. In the late thirteenth century
(1291) a limited number of aljamas or Jewish communities in Castile paid
close to 930,000 mrs. (maravedís) in head taxes and service. The extant list
of those localities paying the head tax did not include the Jewish com-
munity of Toledo or that of Andalusia, which might have doubled the amount
raised in the north. In the Crown of Aragon (which included Aragon,
Valencia, and Catalonia), payments were as follows: in Aragon, the Jewish
aljamas contributed 60,000 sólidos (ss.) of jaca, while the Mudejars added
40,000 ss.; in Catalonia, Jews paid 100,000 sólidos barchinonenses; and in
Valencia they paid 25,000 sólidos regales. Although most of this income was
distributed to members of the royal family, royal agents, noblemen, and
ecclesiastics, it represented an extraordinary contribution to the royal fisc
without need to request funds from the representative assemblies. 20 By 1474,
after the Jewish communities had been greatly diminished by the violence
and waves of conversions in 1391 and afterwards, the income for the entire130 The Sinews of Power
kingdom of Castile only amounted to 450,000 mrs., a figure still formid-
able but far inferior to the income Jews (and Muslims) generated for the
Crown throughout most of the fourteenth century. 21
Among the most important fiscal innovations of the period was the
imposition of the alcabala (a sales tax of around 5 percent on all goods
purchased within the realm) as a regular source of income. A fiscal tool,
both linguistically and institutionally, of Muslim provenance, the alcabala
could be found before 1300, but it was not until Alfonso XI’s reign that
this sales tax became an established and renewable tax imposed through-
out Castile to pay for the siege of Algeciras. As the Castilian Cortes agreed
to extend the tax at each succeeding meeting, the alcabala became a per-
manent addition to a growing variety of royal fiscal tools. Finally, in this
much-abbreviated listing of taxes, the subsidies voted at the meeting of
the Cortes represented a substantial portion of the Spanish monarchy’s
income. As we have seen in previous chapters, getting the Cortes or Corts
to vote a subsidy was not always easy. In early fourteenth-century Castile,
when the Crown was battered by rebellious noblemen and ambitious regents,
Queen María de Molina had to bargain very hard with the urban procur-
ators and concede considerable privileges and tax exemptions to secure the
towns’ financial and military support. In the Crown of Aragon, the kings
chose (or had no other option than) to work through the Corts. Although
it did not always prove easy or agreeable and although these working agree-
ments between Crown and representative assemblies often required signific-
ant concessions, these “constitutional” alternatives were perhaps the only
possible solution to the always pressing fiscal needs of Aragonese kings. After
all, the choice to work through the Corts in the motley eastern kingdoms
had been made long before 1300; by then it had acquired the authority of
tradition. Beyond that, the Generalitat had control of some of the Crown’s
revenues, and subsidies were often financed from these resources.
Control of the Cortes meant control of important tax assets. In the
Realms of Aragon, although its kings enjoyed considerable independent
fiscal power – counting as they did on the income of the royal domain,
feudal or semi-feudal lordly rights, and territorial taxes – royal power was,
by the very nature of the relations between Crown and Corts and between
Crown and other orders of society (nobility and clergy), limited. In Castile
the kings had learned early on that as much as they needed the Cortes and
the cities to withstand magnate ambitions, their own autonomy was com-
promised by urban interference. When Ferdinand IV summoned the Cortes
to Valladolid in 1312, the year of his death, he gave urban representatives
a considerable stake in government, appointing some of their number
to leading administrative positions in his court. The king chose 12 “goodThe Sinews of Power
131
men” to serve as royal alcaldes, plus a series of scribes (escribanos) to serve
them and to register officially their decisions. Those chosen for these posi-
tions came from the ranks of the urban patrician elites, providing a wide
representation of different areas (and towns) throughout the kingdom.
These towns were Burgos, Medina de Pomar, Vitoria, Sahagún, Benavente,
Salamanca, León, Arévalo, Talavera, and Cuenca. Each of these new alcaldes
received 6,000 mrs. annually and the scribes 3,000 mrs. in salary, a sub-
stantial figure indeed. 22
Other kings thought differently. Although it was important to have
urban representatives at court and in the royal bureaucracy, they should
be subordinated to royal policies. Alfonso XI’s naming of royal officials
to administer the towns – the regimiento or regidores – was a move in that
direction. So was the Castilian royal reluctance to summon the Cortes after
the intense flurry of activity during Alfonso XI’s minority at the beginning
of the fourteenth century. Central to the political development of Castile
in the fourteenth and fifteenth centuries was royal neglect of the Cortes.
Urban interests might work temporary alliances with magnates factions and
take sides in civil wars, or for one regent against another, but their collec-
tive fate lay always with the Crown. But why would kings, who in the
thirteenth and early fourteenth centuries had forged such strong links with
their cities, now forsake them and fail to summon the Cortes or to provide
a collective setting for urban grievances and ambitions? The answer is a
brutal one. In the fourteenth and fifteenth centuries, the Castilian kings,
unlike their counterparts in the Crown of Aragon, benefited from auto-
nomous sources of income. Between the ever-increasing amounts they
received from taxes on the movement of livestock throughout the land and
from the export of wool (the kings owned large flocks as well) to Flanders,
the tax on Jews, and what they continually skimmed from the Church, the
Castilian kings did not need to work too many deals with the cities or with
the Cortes. Obviously, the relation remained important and a source of
legitimacy and of fiscal and military support, but the substantial income
kings now enjoyed independent of the approval of the Cortes allowed them
scope to make extravagant gifts to the nobility and to put on excessive dis-
plays. Fiscal agility and some autonomy from institutional restraints were
powerful solutions to the general crisis of the late Middle Ages.
Symbols of Power
Ruling in the Middle Ages was also the difficult art of projecting symbols,
images, and gestures that reminded, and taught, those to be ruled about132 The Sinews of Power
the authority of kings. In a world without TV, radio, e-mail, or newspapers,
kings needed to construct an image of majesty and power superior in every
sense to other symbols of power deployed by those competing with the
Crown. Kings sought also to impress their subjects with the trappings and
symbolic meaning of their office. These aims were achieved, though not
always successfully, through an elaborate structure of rituals, ceremonies,
cultural artifacts (such as palaces, art, literature, and other such cultural
products), dress, and food. They also served as continuous reminders of
the uniqueness of kings. That these symbols and ceremonies often failed
and did not prevent opposition, armed resistance, and even the assassina-
tion or overthrowing of kings does not take away from the fact that these
mechanisms were often very efficient at creating a sense of devotion to the
Crown and at representing the king as the embodiment of the realm.
Sacred and unsacred monarchies
If one needed to emphasize further the differences between Castile and the
Crown of Aragon, nothing would be as effective as to highlight the con-
trasts in how the rulers of each of these realms became kings. It has long
been a trope in medieval historiography that the embryonic development
of fairly centralized monarchies was unavoidably linked to the evolution
of highly ritualized sacral kingship. That is, kings throughout the West devel-
oped ceremonials – some of them with roots in Roman, biblical, and
Germanic traditions – that effectively helped to create what my teacher Joseph
R. Strayer described once as a “religion of monarchy.” Specifically I refer
here to the rites of anointment and coronation which placed the king above
his subjects and which granted an element of sacrality and ecclesiastical
charisma to royal functions and powers. Kings were made by the grace of
God, and anointment and crowning by ecclesiastics reaffirmed the close
link between kings, the Church, and God. In many cases, these traditions,
as seen in the so-called paradigmatic examples of France and England, allowed
kings to claim that they could heal the sick (of scrofula) by the touch of
their hands. 23
So much for these broad formulations. Today we know that many of these
English and French traditions were invented in the central or even late Middle
Ages and given the patina of antiquity so as to command greater author-
ity. We must not imagine these rituals and ceremonies to be immutable.
One of the most remarkable features of Spanish ideas about the nature,
limits, and rituals of power was their adaptability to new circumstances,
and the willingness, certainly in the case of Castile, to embrace specific
(though often modified to the individual king’s taste) rituals, as AlfonsoThe Sinews of Power
133
XI did in his coronation in 1332, or to discard them altogether. Any serious
study of royal ceremonial practices would focus on their differences and
local peculiarities rather than on their uniformity. We know that the kings
of the Crown of Aragon were crowned and anointed in the ancient capital
of Zaragoza, although from time to time, and certainly after the ascent of
the Trastámaras to the throne in 1412, anomalies occurred that departed
from long-established models. 24
In the twelfth century, the count-kings of Catalonia and Aragon had
acknowledged papal suzerainty. Peter II had been crowned by Pope Innocent
III in 1204 while at Rome. There is evidence that Aragonese kings clearly
saw, as the French kings did, the connection between crowning, anointment,
and the legitimating of the ascent to the throne. Peter III (1276 – 85), for
example, did not assume his rightful title of king for almost a year until he
was crowned at Zaragoza. 25 The great Catalan chronicler Ramón Muntaner
describes in detail the events leading to the coronation of Alfonso IV in
1327, as well as the actual ceremonies marking his ascent to the throne.
Once he had buried his father with all the solemnity due to a dead king,
king Alfonso, with his brothers, ecclesiastical dignitaries, noblemen, and
citizens [urban representatives] traveled to the town of Montblanch and held
a meeting to decide where to travel first: whether to Aragon, Valencia, or
Barcelona, for he wished to pay the debts he had with each of his kingdoms
as his ancestors had . . . It was decided to go to Barcelona to hold Corts and
assemblies with the Catalans. By Christmas he was in Barcelona, though he
stopped along the way to visit different localities. In them, he swore to uphold
all the uses, liberties, and privileges, and, in return, the Catalans took oaths
to him as king [count]. On Easter Day, 3 April 1328, to bring happiness to
his people as Christ’s resurrection had brought happiness to his Apostles,
the king came to Zaragoza, ordering that all the magnates, prelates, and urban
representatives meet him there. 26
The account is followed by a long list of those in attendance, including
Muntaner himself as one of the six representatives of Valencia and accom-
panied, as was the case for Muntaner, by children and nephews. In Zaragoza,
and as a prelude to the actual coronation, the king knighted many magnates.
They, in turn, knighted many other lesser nobles and men. Muntaner counted
at least 256 lesser nobles who were knighted that day and who, after the
knighting ceremonies, paraded on horseback through the city from the
cathedral to the king’s palace. Later, in preparation for his coronation on
Easter Sunday, the king kept vigil through the night of Good Friday. On
Saturday the king and his court abandoned the clothes of mourning they
had worn for the previous king, and the feasts began with abundant music.134 The Sinews of Power
In a ceremonial procession, the king traveled to the cathedral, surrounded
by magnates, knights, and music, and he remained there throughout
Saturday night. At dawn, the king “with his own hands” placed the sword
and crown on the altar and dressed himself. Among his vestments, he
also wore some ecclesiastical garments. The bishop of the city witnessed
and helped in every detail of the ritual investment of the king: from the
king taking his sword and girding it on himself to the placement of his
spurs on his feet by his royal brothers to the appropriate prayers. The king,
brandishing his sword, defied the enemies of the Catholic faith, promised
to defend orphans, children, and widows, and maintain justice, offering
his sword and his life to God. This was followed by the bishop’s anoint-
ment of the king’s shoulder and right arm. A mass followed after which
the king took the crown from the altar and crowned himself.
Muntaner’s chronicle continues with a detailed description of the festivities
that followed, and I beg your forgiveness for this extended summary of the
chronicler’s account of Alfonso IV’s self-crowning and ecclesiastical anoint-
ment. The actual story is far richer and takes almost 20 pages of the printed
edition. The ritual program is quite different from French or English practices
and, even more so, from those of Castile. First, self-crowning and anoint-
ment takes place after the king meets the Cortes or Corts and swears to
uphold the liberties of Catalonia (and eventually those of Aragon). Second,
the coronation is in Zaragoza, and the king, following the practice of
Portuguese and Castilian kings, insisted on knighting himself. Third, there
is an implicit association throughout Muntaner’s narrative between the king
and Christ – and this coming from an urban representative of Valencia! –
and the choice of Easter Sunday for Alfonso’s coronation, mixed with the
ending of mourning and rebirth, sent a powerful message to those present.
They, in turn, would go home and retell the story. Muntaner, who by this
time in his life had seen and experienced much, cannot mask his admira-
tion for all the festivities, for the quality of the horses, for the splendor of
the royal sword and crown. Clearly these ceremonies, and Alfonso IV’s crown-
ing in particular, worked at the deepest level in binding social groups together
and instilling loyalty to the king and kingdom – the magnates and knights
rode through the streets crying “Aragon, Aragon.” And finally, the king
crowned himself, making it clear to all, and particularly the ecclesiastics,
that the right to rule resided within him. The 1327 ceremonies tell us vividly
of the differences between the Crown of Aragon and European northern
realms. They tell us about how the Aragonese kings deployed rituals and
celebrations to strengthen their power and to make claims to ecclesiast-
ical roles not open to their many secular rivals. They tell us as well as how
very different the Aragonese ways were from those of Castile.The Sinews of Power
135
Castile’s non-sacral monarchy
There were also coronations and anointments in late medieval Castile, but
they were exceptions rather than part of a well-established tradition. A few
kings, Alfonso XI in 1332, Henry II, the new Trastámara king, after his ascent
to the throne in 1365, were crowned (self-crowned) or partially anointed,
but even the new Trastámara dynasty with its flimsy claims to the throne
ignored those sacralizing ceremonies that marked the assumption of king-
ship in other parts of the medieval West. This is quite remarkable since the
Trastámaras, once they began to rule the Crown of Aragon, demonstrated
a healthy appetite for crowning, anointing, and royal rituals, as Ferdinand
of Antequera’s lavish coronation showed. 27 In Castile, however, there was
not a clear relationship between ascending the throne and being crowned,
even in those rare instances in which such ceremonies took place.
Alfonso XI had been king for two decades before organizing the spectacle
of knighting, coronation, and anointment at Santiago and Burgos in 1332.
By then he was already married, had an heir, and was as firmly in control
of his realm as he would ever be in his long and distinguished rule. His
coronation ceremony, which I have glossed elsewhere, 28 followed closely on
the patterns we have already seen for the coronation of Alfonso IV in Zaragoza
just a few years earlier. It may have been, in fact, inspired by the Aragonese
example, with some peculiar differences. Alfonso XI was knighted by the
mechanical arm of an image of St. James then at Compostela and which
can still be seen at the monastery of Las Huelgas in Burgos. Peter Linehan
has argued that this particular mechanical sculpture had come into Castile
only in the first half of the fourteenth century, becoming, as it were, the
foundation of an invented tradition. 29 Alfonso XI was crowned at Las Huelgas,
a great Cistercian monastery and one of the sites, together with Compostela,
Toledo, Seville, and León, vying to become a “sacral” center for the Castilian
monarchy. Alfonso XI also crowned himself and was anointed only on the
shoulder. The Church, as had been the case at Zaragoza, played a secondary
role, and the ordo or script for the coronation, written by a Portuguese bishop
and long deployed as an example of Castilian alleged sacral monarchy, was
in fact discarded altogether and replaced by ceremonies scripted either by
the young monarch or his agents.
Some scholars, notably Nieto Soria, have argued that even though the
Castilian kings had chosen to abstain from ceremonial crowning and
anointment, their rule had all the trappings of sacral kingship, as was the
case elsewhere in western Europe. Whether in their hearts and minds these
kings, or their ministers, believed that God had anointed and crowned them
in spirit, or whether such propaganda was an attempt to explain the absence136 The Sinews of Power
of such rituals, the argument misses the point altogether. 30 And that is that
in Castile, where there was a rich tradition of crowning and anointing
harking back to Visigothic and Asturian precedents and to the ceremonial
crownings of Alfonso VI and Alfonso VII (late eleventh and early twelfth
centuries), for a series of complex reasons the Castilian kings abandoned
these practices by the second half of the twelfth century. 31
Absence of ecclesiastically sponsored rituals of coronation and anoint-
ment did not mean at all that there was an absence of tradition or, far
more important, of legitimacy in the Castilian kings’ ascent to power. The
Castilian monarchs developed a set of alternate and richly textured rituals
that proved to be as successful in the long run as Church-related tradi-
tions. These included elevation on a chair or shield, exchanges of oaths
between the king and his “people,” the swearing of fealty by the Cortes,
self-knighting, and most of all, the association of kingly power with the
work of the Reconquest. It is quite remarkable how much mileage the
Castilian kings extracted from the ida contra los Moros (the announcement
of raids against Islam, or Crusades). We know that the royal military leader-
ship of the Crusades against Muslims in the south or those in Granada brought
substantial fiscal advantages since it allowed the kings to tap directly into
the Church’s income. And the same call to arms proved irresistible to the
Cortes as well. Alfonso XI proved that repeatedly in the 1330s and 1340s
when he requested funding for his campaigns against the Merinids in the
south. Alfonso XI was a king without many of the political problems that
plagued his descendants; yet later kings were also able to exploit their role
as leaders of the host, the embodiment of the struggle against Islam, and
defenders of Christendom.
Sumptuary Laws and Ceremonies of Power
Sacred or unsacred rituals associated with the making of kings underpinned
a whole structure of other celebrations which, on the whole, sought to
separate the figure of the king from that of his subjects. Although I could
spend another chapter describing and explicating these additional tools of
power, for the sake of brevity I will simply summarize them here. Dressing
and eating were powerful markers of social distinction in the medieval world.
They served to create a distance between the king and ambitious magnates.
Sumptuary laws in mid-thirteenth- to mid-fourteenth-century Castile,
although aiming to erect rigid boundaries between merchants and nobles,
between Jews and Christians, also restricted certain furs, clothes, and colorsThe Sinews of Power
137
to the use of the royal family. Similarly, under the pretext of imposing some
austerity on a spendthrift nobility, the laws set out monetary guidelines as
to how much was to be spent on food for the royal table and what types
of food were to be consumed. At the same time, these laws also set limits
on what magnates were to spend on their food on a daily basis.
The growth of court ceremonial and the enhanced importance of etiquette,
a clear development in the fourteenth and fifteenth centuries, went far beyond
the establishment of well-defined hierarchies of eating and dressing. We
know that from the mid-fourteenth century onward chronicles, both royal
and private, began to pay a great deal of attention to how people dressed
at court. This was particularly the case in the descriptions of the royal
family and great nobles. Similar attention was also paid to what and how
much they ate. Muntaner already gives testimony to this new sensitivity.
The anonymous Hechos del condestable Don Miguel Lucas de Iranzo over-
whelms the reader with its descriptions of the banqueting, clothing, and
festivities sponsored by the constable in 1460s Jaén. 32
Increased attention to appearances was paralleled by a more punctilious
observance of etiquette and by the triumph of a literary culture at court.
We will explore some of these issues in greater detail in chapter 8, but here
it may suffice to indicate that the transformation of Aragonese–Catalan and
Castilian culture(s) under the influence of Renaissance models imported
from Italy deeply affected the development of court society and helped
legitimize kingly power. And kings through festivals also extended their power.
Again we will examine some of these festivals in the context of cultural
production (for they were cultural artifacts) in chapter 8, but one must
remember the extent to which royal entries (an integral component of Alfonso
IV’s ceremonial tour of his realms), to give just one example, were among
the most effective tools for the ruler. Royal (or princely) entries – the first
ceremonial visit of a new king to one of the realm’s cities – provided an
opportunity for the display of royal power and to give lessons to subjects
on obedience and respect for the king, and served as sites for intense nego-
tiations between town and Crown. Even weak kings, such as Henry IV of
Castile, could mount spectacular and theatrical entries to buttress royal
authority. 33 Henry IV’s royal entry into Jaén reflects the resources that rulers
had even at a time when the monarchy was in peril. Already deep in trou-
ble because of magnate rebellions, the king came to Jaén in 1464 to visit
his former favorite, Don Miguel Lucas de Iranzo, constable of Castile. A
short summary of this entry will give an idea of the manner in which
powerful symbols were deployed for the benefit of a vulnerable king and
an equally vulnerable constable:
